:h1.RPF User's Guide version 2. Release 0.0.
.ju off
.ti ¬ 05
.tb set 10 20 30 40 50 60 70
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.


              RRRRRRRRRRRRRRRR
              RRRR        RRRR                       FFFFFFFFFFFFFFFFF
             RRRR         RRR                        FFFF           F
            RRRR        RRRR                        FFFF
           RRRRRRRRRRRRRRR                         FFFF      F
          RRRR   RRRR        PPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPFFFFFFFFFFF
         RRRR    RRRR        PPPP         PPPP   FFFF      F
        RRRR     RRRR       PPPP          PPP   FFFF
       RRRR      RRRR      PPPP         PPPP   FFFF
     RRRRRR     RRRRRRRRRRPPPPPPPPPPPPPPPP    FFFF
                         PPPP                FFFF
                        PPPP               FFFFFF
                       PPPP
                      PPPP
                     PPPP
                   PPPPPP








    Version 2.    Release 0.0
:exmp.
:efig.
:h2.Introduction.
:p.
RPF is a command processor under TSO, developed by Rob Prins
member of the systems programming department of the ING
Bank in Amsterdam. For program development the ING Bank used ROSCOE,
but when the systems programming group started using TSO for
maintenance, the need arose for a full-screen editor under TSO. at
this point Rob decided to develop their own editor, not only
because they needed an editor, but also for learning the internals of
TSO. This resulted in the 'RPF' package. It is not only an editor,
but it also includes functions like Library Functions (SCRATCH, RENAME
EDIT, PRINT, BROWSE, and assigning ALIAS), foreground assembly and
link edit, VTOC, and catalog listing, data set allocation and
deletion and even a LIBRARIAN
and ARCHIVER interface to read and write modules on a disk
master file and a TSO command processor to execute TSO commands in
RPF.  The main advantage of an inhouse developed package is, that the
source is available, so that it can be tailored to the demands of the
user. As the package became available to the users (the systems
programmers) they very soon stopped using ROSCOE for program
development, which indicated that it is a very useful product.  RPF
runs in a MVS38J, MVS/380, MVS/XA, MVS/ESA, OS/390 and z/OS operating
system. Afterwards the RPF product became available for the members
of the Hercules group.
:p.RPF supports a lot of screen sizes. The minimum size = a 3270
model 2 (24 lines x 80 columns). The maximum size is 99 lines.
The maximum screen width = 200 bytes.
All sizes in between are supported (exampe: 99x132).
The maximum buffer size (screen width x screen size) = 16384
(16K).
:p.
:p.
:p.
(C)-1979-2025 Skybird Systems, email: prin0096@gmail.com
Internet: www.prince-webdesign.nl/rpf
:h3.RPF data set naming conventions.
:p.
All data set names entered in the RPF panels uses the standard
TSO data set naming conventions.
:p.
If a data set name is entered enclosed in single quotes ('), the
data set name is treated as fully qualified.
:p.
Data set names entered without quotes will be prefixed with the TSO
prefix. The TSO prefix is defaulted to the UserID, but can be altered
with the TSO command:
:p.
:xmp.
PROFILE PREFIX('new prefix')
:exmp.
:p.
E.g., It the name A.CNTL is entered and the TSO prefix is A0611, the
data set name would be A0611.A.CNTL.
:p.
A data set name entered as 'SYS1.PARMLIB' remains unchanged.
:p.
:h2.How to start RPF.
:p.
RPF is a TSO command processor for full screen data editing, and
utility functions.
RPF can be activated by entering the command 'RPF' on
your TSO terminal.
:h3.How to work with RPF.
:p.
If you start RPF a profile member will be read from a partitioned
data set with a record length of 80 with defaults for your userid.
The member name = @RPFPROF.
If the member is not present, the member will be created by RPF.
.br
The DD-statement ISPPROF in the TSO LOGON procedure should point
to the profile data set. If omitted, RPF choose her own defaults.
.br
You also can start RPF with an option. E.g., RPF 3.4 will go directly
to DSLIST.
:p.
After RPF has started without operands, the following main menu
appears on the screen.
:p.
:xmp.
------------------------------- RPF Main menu -------------(C)-1979-2025 Skybird
Option  ===>
                                                             Userid  - A0611
   0  DEFAULTS     Alter / Display session defaults          Time    - 16:01:25
   1  BROWSE       View or browse data sets or members       System  - TK5R
   2  EDIT         Update or create data sets or members     TSO-proc- ISPLOGON
   3  UTILITY      Enter UTILITY                             Prefix  - A0611
   4  ASSEMBLER    Foreground ASSEMBLER and LINK edit        Terminal- CUU0C0
   5  USER         Execute RPF user routine                  Release - V2R0M0
   6  TSO          Execute TSO commands                      OS rel. - 038
   7  TUTORIAL     Display HELP information
   8  TEST         Enter TEST mode (Authorized)               January   2025
   9  OPERATOR     Enter OPERATOR mode                     Su Mo Tu We Th Fr Sa
   X  EXIT         Terminate RPF                                     1  2  3  4
                                                            5  6  7  8  9 10 11
                                                           12 13 14 15 16 17 18
____________________________________________________       19 20 21 22 23 24 25
|                                                  |       26 27 28 29 30 31
| RPF V2R0M0, Build: 2024-12-08T15:41+01           |
| Use of RPF is free, modifications in consultation|
| with me. Information: prin0096@gmail.com         |
| www.prince-webdesign.nl/rpf                      |
|__________________________________________________|

Hit PF03/15 to terminate RPF                       (C)-1979-2025 Skybird Systems
:exmp.
:p.
Figure 1. RPF main menu
:h2 id=def. Change session defaults.
:p.
The session defaults are placed in member @RPFPROF in the
partitioned data set specified in the ISPPROF DD-statement
of the TSO logon procedure or allocated with the TSO ALLOCATE command.
:p.
You can change the following defaults in the profile member:
:p.
:ol.
:li.The maximum number of lines for the editor. The minimum is 500
lines, and the maximum is 999,999 lines.  Default is 7,000 lines.
:li.SYSOUT class. The default is SYSOUT class C. SYSOUT class will
be used in the print commands of RPF.
:li.Logging YES or NO. This default is for future use.
:li.Nulls YES or NO. This default will set the RPF
editor in NULLS mode or NONULLS mode.
:li.AUTOSAVE Y or N. With this default the workspace will
be saved automatically if AUTOSAVE=Y. With AUTOSAVE=N, EDIT will
issue the message 'Enter SAVE, CANCEL or END'.
:li.
Replace = YES or NO. The parameter defaults the Replace like members
in Move/Copy.
:li.
Default prefix. This is a field of maximum 17 bytes containing the
default prefix in the data set list menu (opt. 3.4).
:li.
COLS = Y or N. Set or reset the scale line in EDIT.
:li.
Confirm = / or <blank>. Set 'Confirm member delete' for Library
Functions and Archiver interface.
:li.
CAPS = AUT, ON or OFF. Set CAPS mode for EDIT. If AUT = specified,
EDIT will automatically detect if lower case characters and sets
CAPS to OFF. If no lower case characters are detected, CAPS will
be set to OFF.
.br
If CAPS = ON, EDIT will set CAPS to ON, no matter whether lower
case characters are detected or not.
.br
IF CAPS = OFF, EDIT will set CAPS to OFF, even if only upper-case
characters are detected.
:li.
The default program name of the assembler. This name is used in the
assembler menu (option 4).
:li.Default allocations.
You can specify the default member name,
data set name for EDIT, Browse, utility and assembler functions.
For LIBRARIAN, the default module name and LIBRARIAN master
file can be specified. For the ARCHIVER,
the default Archive VSAM cluster can be specified.
:li.Printer. Specify the remote printer. If nothing
specified, the output will be routed to a LOCAL printer.
:li.PFK settings:   You can set the commands in the PFKs (1 to 24)
The use of all PFKs is supported in EDIT, BROWSE
Library Functions, LIBRARIAN maintenance and HELP
functions.
The use of the END PFK (PF03 or PF15) is
supported in all selection menus.
Meaning of the 'CON' attribute:
CON=Y: The command in the PFK will set in the
command area on the screen, but will not be
executed.
To execute the command you should press ENTER
CON=N: The command will be executed
immediately.
CON=X: The PFK has gotten the 'UNDEFINED' status.
:li.Assembler maclibs. Specify up to 6 maclibs.
:li.Assembler parm. This is the default assembler parm in the
foreground assembly.
:li.Linkage editor parm. This is the default linkage editor parm in the
foreground assembly.
:li.Linkage editor control statements. 6 optional statements used by
the linkage editor.
:eol.
:p.
All the changed defaults will be written on the profile data set
if present.
.br
If you select -0- on the main menu the default menu appears on the
screen:
:p.
With selection -0- you can list the status of your RPF session.
In this screen the date and time, session duration, EDIT options,
default options, current allocation, workspace size and lines of
the workspace in use are to be displayed.
Press ENTER to leave this status screen.
:p.
With -1- you can change the workspace size, the logging,
the SYSOUT class, Autosave, Submit, Replace, default prefix,
COLS attribute, and CONFIRM attribute.
To change these defaults, press ENTER after the changes made.
To cancel the changes, use PF03/PF15.
:p.
With -2- you can change the
default allocations, LIBRARIAN and ARCHIVER allocations.
To change these defaults press ENTER after the changes made.
To cancel the changes, use PF03/PF15.
:p.
With -3- you can change your PFK settings.
:p.
With -4- you can update the assembler program name, assembler
maclibs, assembler- and linkage editor parameters,
parameters, and the default linkage editor control statements.
.br
To leave the default menus press PF03/PF15.
:p.
It is also possible to select the default functions directly from
the RPF main menu, without interference of the defaults menu (e.g.
select '0.1' for increase workspace). If the function is terminated
in this case, RPF always returns to the main menu.
:h2 id=brw. Browse data sets, members or load modules.
:p.
If you select -1- on the RPF main menu, a data entry screen will
be displayed for selection of the to be browsed data set.
You can select the data sets in two ways:
:ul c.
:li.Select the member name/data set name (and volume serial) in
the allocation menu.
:li.Select 1 of the data sets in the data set selection menu, by
placing the cursor in the line of the requested data set and hitting
ENTER.
.br
If '=n(.n)' is entered in the member name or data set name,
RPF returns to the main menu and executes option n(.n).
:eul.
After selection of this data set, the BROWSE function will be invoked,
and the data set (and volume serial) will be placed in selection list.
This selection list will be written in the RPF profile data set
upon exit of RPF.
:p.
If the member is not specified, a member selection list has
been displayed.
If you select an 'S' in front of the chosen member, The browse
processor
will be invoked. See also :hdref refid=pdsm for information about
The 'S' line command.
:p.
The following RPF browse primary commands are available:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.ASCII
:dd.Toggle ASCII mode on or off. If in ASCII mode, the data will
be translated to EBCDIC.
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Start display with the bottom of the data set.
An alias of 'BOTTOM' is 'B'.
:dt.C nnn
:dd.Shift the display to column nnn.
nnn should not exceed the record length of the data set.
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Scroll forward from the cursor position if the cursor is in
the data. If the cursor is not in the data, 1 screen will be
scrolled forward.
If you use DOWN with a PFK and an 'M' in the
command field the 'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
:dt.END
:dd.Terminate BROWSE. RPF will go back to the utility allocation menu.
:dt.F 'string'
:dd.search specified character string. All lines, which
contains 'string' will be highlighted, and the
message 'Chars string found' will appear.
If only an 'F' is entered, a repeat find of the
previous specified string will be done.
The find always start from the current position in
the data set. If no match can be found, the message
'Bottom of data reached' will appear.
The quotes (') around 'string' can be omitted, if
no blanks are inside the string.
.br
An alias of F is 'FIND'.
:dt.F x'hhhh..'
:dd.Search for HEX strings in the data set.
:dt.HEX
:dd.Toggle HEX mode of the browser on or off.
In HEX mode, each record contains of 4 lines: 1) The
original line. 2) A hex line containing the high-order HEX nibbles.
3). A hex line containing the low-order nibbles. 4) A separator line.
.br
The HEX command will be ignored if a data set or member with
RECFM=U is browsed.
:dt.LEFT
:dd.Scroll 1 screen to the left (80 bytes for screens
model 2,3,4 and up to 200 bytes for a huge terminal).
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen and alter PFKs if you
wish. These PFK changes are only effective
during this RPF session.
To change the PFK-s permanent use the defaults menu.
:dt.PRINT x
:dd.Print the data set into SYSOUT class x.
If you omit the SYSOUT class, the default SYSOUT class will be taken.
:dt.RETURN
:dd.Terminate BROWSE. RPF will go back immediately to the main menu.
:dt.=n or =n.n
:dd.Terminate BROWSE. RPF will go back to MAIN, and option 'n' or
'n.n' will be executed
:dt.RIGHT
:dd.Scroll 1 screen to the right (80 bytes for screens
model 2,3,4 and up to 200 bytes for a huge terminal).
:dt.SUB(MIT)
:dd.Submit the data set with the TSO SUBMIT command.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the data set.
An alias of 'TOP' is 'T'.
:dt.TSO
:dd.Execute TSO commands. Module RPFTSO will be invoked.
:dt.UP
:dd.Scroll backward to the cursor position if the cursor is
in the data. If the cursor is not in the data, 1 screen will
be scrolled backward.
If you use UP with a PFK and an 'M' in the
command field the 'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
:edl.
:lblbox.Notes.
:ul.
:li.All these commands can be set under a PFK.
So, you can use the PFKs instead of entering the commands
on the screen.
:li.If you print the data set with the 'PRINT' command
RPF will make header lines if the data set does not
contain ASA or machine control characters.
If the to be browsed input data set is a card image data set
(LRECL=80 and no control characters), a scale line will be
printed after the header lines and after each record, the
start column of the first non-blank character of that line
will be printed.
If the control characters are present RPF does not
make headers.
:li.If a RECFM=U data set is browsed/viewed, the output will be
formatted on the screen. The output records fit within the screen
width and more records will be written if the RECFM=U data set has
larger records. The output contains a HEX offset, the data line,
a record with the high-order HEX nibble, a record with the low-order
nibbles and a HEX ruler.
:eul.
:elblbox.
:h2 id=edit. EDIT a data set or PDS member.
:p.
If you select option '2' on the RPF main menu, the EDIT function
will be performed.
.br
The EDIT data entry screen contains of two parts.
:ol.
:li.The data entry screen.
In this part of the screen you can perform the allocation
of the data set to be edited.
If the allocations are alright, the data set or PDS member will
be edited and the EDIT screen appears, otherwise the user will be
prompted for retry.
:li.The data set selection list.
:eol.
You can select the data sets in two ways:
:ul c.
:li.Select the member name/data set name (and volume serial) in
the allocation menu.
:li.Select 1 of the data sets in the data set selection menu, by
placing the cursor in the line of the requested data set and hitting
ENTER.
:eul.
:p.
If '=n(.n)' is entered in the member name or data set name,
RPF returns to the main menu and executes option n(.n).
.br
After selection of this data set, the Edit function will be invoked.
and the data set (and volume serial) will be placed in selection list.
This selection list will be written in the RPF data set, if
you leave RPF.
If you want to cancel the function, press PF03 or PF15.
:p.
If the member is not specified, a member selection list has
been displayed.
If you select an 'S' in front of the chosen member, The editor
will be invoked. See also :hdref refid=pdsm for information about
The 'S' line command.
:p.
If the member does not exist, an input screen will be made with 1
screen blank lines and in the header line will appear 'Input  mmmmmmm'.
'mmmmmmmmm' is the data set name and (member) if present.
If the data set or member exists: 'Input' is replaced by 'Edit'.
If the data set is edited you can change your data in fullscreen mode.
The screen is divided into 5 parts:
:ul c.
:li.The header, containing the data set name, the member name
and the ISPF version/modification level (vv.mm) if available.
:li.The message area for the informational and error messages
:li.The BNDS field with the editor boundaries.
:li.The scroll amount.
:li.The data area, containing the data to be edited.
:eul.
The editor can be entered in standard or in COBOL mode and
will be automatically detected.
In the standard mode, the amount of columns to display is the width
of the screen minus 8 or the complete record if the record fits
in the screen. Example: if the LRECL of the data set is 133 and
the width of the screen is 80, 72 columns will be displayed.
If the record of the data does not fit on the screen, the RIGHT
and LEFT can be used to scroll.
.br
In the COBOL mode columns 7-78 will be displayed if an 80-column
screen is used. The line numbers (if present)
or created by the 'RENUM' command will affect cols 1-6.
COBOL mode works only if the record length of the data
set = 80.
.sp
If the the last 8 columns or columns 1-6 (COBOL only) of the
data set are numbered,
manual modification of these columns is ignored.
.br
In both cases, you can work with line-numbers in the commands,
because the numbers on the screen are NOT in the data set
.br
If a data set does not contain line numbers,
the editor will be entered in 'NONUM' mode.
.br
If you do program development press CAPS LOCK, use the UC line
command, or enter the CAPS ON command.
.br
If the data contains unprintable characters,
the lines with unprintable characters cannot be edited.
.br
If you have entered a wrong command or invalid command the command
will be repeated, so you can make easy your corrections.
:p.There are two types of commands:
.br
The primary commands entered in the 'command' field
(see :hdref refid=eprim ).
.br
Line commands entered in the linenumber fields
(see :hdref refid=eline ).
:h3 id=eprim. EDIT primary commands.
:p.
The EDIT primary commands are described in alphabetic order below:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.=n or =n.n
:dd.Terminate the editor, return to MAIN and option 'n' or
'n.n' will be executed. The data will be saved if changes are made.
:dt.APPEND
:dd.Append another data set or member in the EDIT workspace.
After entering 'APPEND', the data set menu will appear.
Alter the allocations and press ENTER to append.
With the END command the data will be saved in the data set/member
which is initially edited.
:dt.AUTOSAVE ON/OFF
:dd.Turn on or off AUTOSAVE. With AUTOSAVE ON, the data will be
automatically saved.
.br
With AUTOSAVE OFF and the data is changed, RPF EDIT will issue
the message 'Enter SAVE, CANCEL or END'.
.br
If SAVE entered, the data will be saved and the editor will terminate.
.br
If CANCEL entered, RPF stays in the editor.
.br
If END entered, EDIT will execute the primary command CANCEL.
.br
The initial value (ON or OFF) will be controlled by the
AUTOSAVE parameter in the defaults (option 0.1).
:dt.BNDS n,m
:dd.With this command you can set the range of columns
which will be used in 'C', 'F', 'FILL', 'UC',
'LC' and 'SORT' primary commands.
.br
If you enter this command without operands:
.br
1. If COBOL is set to ON, the boundaries are column 7
to 72.
.br
2. If the edited data set/member contains fixed records the
boundary range covers the visible part of the data in the screen.
If the data is numbered and the visible part is the end of
the record or the complete record, the end boundary is record
length - 8.
3. If the edited data set/member contains variable records, the
boundary range covers the visible part of the data in the screen.
If the data is numbererd the start boundary is set to 9, if the
visible part of the data is positioned from the beginning.
.br
If the second operand is 999, the end boundary is the
record length of the data set or member.
.br
Another possibility to set the boundary range is
changing the 'BNDS' value in the right corner
of the EDIT screen.
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display last screen of the data set.
This command may be abbreviated as 'B'
:dt.C /aaa/bbb/(A)
:dd.With this command, you can change character strings
throughout your entire workspace.
If you do not specify the 'A' after the last
delimiter, only the first line on the screen will
be changed, otherwise the first line till the end
of the workspace will be changed.
If you enter 'C /string//(A)' the character string
will be deleted.
With 'C //string/(A)' the character string will be
inserted before the first character of the line,
or all lines if 'A' is specified.
The delimiter can be any character.
Only character strings will be changed, which are
in the column-range, that is set by the 'BNDS' primary command.
:dt.C /aa/bb/n,m
:dd.With this form of the 'C' command you can make
changes in a specified line range (n,m). both
numbers should be specified. If you want to
change 1 line use first the 'L nnnn' command
and after this command 'C /aaa/bbb/'.
If n = '*' change will be done beginning with the
current line.
In this case the second number should be after the current line.
:dt.C /x'hh..'/bbb/n,m  or C /x'hh..'/bbb/(A)
:dd.Change HEX character(s) 'hh..' into 'bbb'
The 'x' can be specified in lower- or upper-case.
:dt.C /aaa/x'hh..'/n,m  or C /aaa/x'hh..'/(A)
:dd.Change string 'aaa' into HEX string 'hh..'
The 'x' can be specified in lower- or upper-case.
:dt.C /x'hh..'/x'jj..'/n,m  or C /x'hh..'/x'jj..'/(A)
:dd.Change HEX string 'hh..'into HEX string 'jj..'
The 'x' can be specified in lower- or upper-case.
.br.
Example 1: C /X'404040'/X'2020'/A change 3 blanks into
2x X'20'. C /   /X'2020'/A is equivalent.
:dt.C /P'.'/bb/n,m or C /P'.'/x'hh..'/(n,m) or (A)
:dd.Change invalid characters into string 'bb' or
into HEX string x'hh..'.
.br.
Example 2: C /P'.'/ /A  Change all invalid characters
into a blank. C /P'.'/X'40'/a is equivalent.
.br
If a line is successfully changed, the line number will be reversed.
:dt.CANCEL
:dd.Terminate the RPF EDIT function, without saving
the workspace. This command may be abbreviated as 'CAN'.
.br
If changes are made, a warning message 'Discard changes?' will be
given. A reply YES or NO is needed to discard the changes or not.
:dt.CAPS ON/OFF
:dd.Set the editor dynamically in CAPS mode with CAPS ON or in
ASIS mode with CAPS OFF.
:dt.CANCEL
:dd.Terminate the RPF EDIT function, without saving
the workspace. This command may be abbreviated as 'CAN'
:dt.CO n,m,o
:dd.Copy line range n till m after line o.
If you specify n=* the current line till line m will be copied.
If 'o' is omitted line n will be copied after line m.
If the CO command cannot be executed, a suitable
error message will be displayed.
After successful copy, the workspace will be renumbered.
:dt.COBOL ON/OFF
:dd.Set the editor in COBOL mode if ON is specified or in
standard mode of OFF is specified.
In COBOL mode, the 'LEFT' and 'RIGHT' primary commands
are disabled.
If the editor was in 'NUM' mode before the 'COBOL ON'
command was given, RPFEDIT will do a numeric test
for columns 01-06 of the workspace. If not numeric
RPFEDIT will come into the 'NONUM' mode after the 'COBOL ON'
command.
If the editor was in 'NUM' mode before the 'COBOL OFF'
command was given, RPFEDIT will do a numeric test
for last 8 columns of the workspace. If not numeric
RPFEDIT will come into the 'NONUM' mode after the 'COBOL OFF'
command.
:dt.COLS
:dd.Toggle display of the scale line in EDIT.
:dt.COPY
:dd.Copy a data set or member after the line marked with an 'A'
(after), 'TT' (before first line) or 'BB' (after last line).
The data entry panel will appear to select the data set or
member. After selecting, the data set or member will be copied.
:dt.CREATE
:dd.Save a range of lines with line commands 'CC -- CC', CB or CT
into a data set or member. An alias of CREATE is CRE.
:p.
:hp2.Example:ehp2.
.br
To save the complete data in another data set or member:
.br
Enter CREATE in the command field and CB in the first line of the
data.
:p.
A SAVE menu will be displayed.
.br
The SAVE menu have 5 options.
:ul c.
:li.Option 1, save into a PDS(E) or sequential data set (default).
:li.Option 2, save into a PDS(E) or sequential data set with
the REPLACE option.
:li.Option 3, save into a LIBRARIAN masterfile.
:li.Option 4, save into an ARCHIVE VSAM cluster.
:eul.
:p.
If you save in a PDS(E) member that already exists
and that member is not the same as the original
member edited, the user will be prompted to replace
the member or enter a 'newname', except if option
'2' has been selected (SAVE RE-USE).
If you select option '3' on the SAVE menu,
the rest of the parameters are ignored and RPF
will select the LIBRARIAN menu (see :hdref refid=libu )
.br
Option '4' will perform saving upon an Archiver VSAM cluster.
See :hdref refid=archu
If the workspace is saved into a PDS member, RPF
will update the statistics in the directory or
add statistics if the statistics are not already present.
.br
The directory entry after save is built as follows:
:ul c.
:li.member name (8 bytes EBCDIC)
:li.TTR (3 bytes hex)
:li.C (1 byte binary X'0F' or X'14')
:li.version (1 byte binary unsigned)
:li.modification (1 byte binary unsigned)
:li.flags (1 byte hex)
:li.seconds of time updated (1 byte packed without sign)
:li.date added (4 bytes packed '0CyydddF')
:li.date updated (4 bytes packed '0CyydddF')
:li.time updated (2 bytes packed without sign 'hhmm')
:li.number of records (2 bytes binary unsigned)
:li.initial number of records (2 bytes binary unsigned)
:li.modified number records (2 bytes binary unsigned)
:li.ID (7 bytes EBCDIC)
:li.blanks (3 bytes EBCDIC)
:eul.
.br
If bit 2 of flags is set to 1, an extended area is present starting
from the second byte in "blanks" and contains:
:ul c.
:li.number of records (4 bytes binary unsigned)
:li.initial number of records (4 bytes binary unsigned)
:li.modified number records (4 bytes binary unsigned)
:eul.
:dt.CUT
:dd.Copy lines between CC (See :hdref refid=eline ), first line to CT
or CB to last line to the clipboard file.
.br
Instead of the copy line commands, also the move line commands
can be used (MM, first line to MT and MB to last line).
.br
The clipboard file is allocated with ddname RPFCTPST.
The contents of the clipboard file can be pasted in any member or
data set in the current RPF session. The clipboard will be deleted
upon end of the RPF session.
:dt.DEL n,m
:dd.Delete lines n till m or delete line n if m is omitted.
:dt.DEL *,n
:dd.Delete n lines starting with the first line on the screen.
If n is omitted only the first line on the screen
has been deleted.
:dt.$DOC
:dd.Add a date and timestamp after '//* last update: ' in
the record. '//* LAST UPDATE: ' is also valid. Code this
string exactly with a blank after '*' and a blank after ':'.
:dt.DOWN
:dd.With this command you can scroll forward.
.br
The scroll value is specified in the screen,
which can be: 'PAGE' for a complete screen,
'CSR' for scroll on cursor position (if scroll
forward, line on which the cursor is located,
becomes the first line. If scroll backward, line
on which the cursor is located, becomes the last
line. If the cursor is in the command field,
the number of lines on the screen minus 1 will be scrolled).
'HALF' for a half screen or 'LINE' for a
single line. If you want to change this value
you can alter this first character in this field
('C', 'H', 'P' or 'L').
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the
'DOWN' command is given by means of a PFK the
'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
.br
If you enter 'nnnnn' (max 5 positions 0-9) and the DOWN command has
been given by means of a PFK,
'nnnnn' lines will be scrolled forward.
:dt.END
:dd.Terminate the RPF EDIT function and save the data if changes are
made. No menu will be presented. The data will be saved in the
same data set/member, if AUTOSAVE=Y.
RPF will return to the EDIT allocation menu.
If AUTOSAVE=N, the message 'Enter SAVE, CANCEL or END' will be
issued and EDIT will not be terminated.
:dt.F 'String' (nnn) or F "String" (nnn)
:dd.Find a specified character string in the workspace.
If the character string is found, the cursor will be set on
the found string.
If the find is unsuccessful a suitable error
message will be displayed and the command will be repeated.
The delimiter (the quote or double quote) is optional, unless 'string'
contains blanks.
.br
If nnn is specified, FIND will be executed only in column nnn.
E.g. F RPF 10 = Find string RPF in column 10.
.br
The character string (and start column) will be remembered by RPF,
so you can enter only an 'F' to execute the last FIND command.
Only character strings will be found, which are
in the column-range, that is set by the 'BNDS' primary command.
.br
An alias of F is FIND.
.br
If the repeat F is exhausted with message Bottom of data reached,
and immediately a subsequent repeat F is given, search will
start from the beginning.
:dt.F p'.' or F P'.' (nnn)
:dd.This is a special form of the F primary command. With this F
primary command you can search for invalid characters in the
workspace. After a successful F P'.', the user will be
notified which invalid character is found
(message: Chars X'..' found).
:dt.F x'hhhh..' (nnn)
:dd.Search for HEX strings in the workspace.
:dt.FILL /string/
:dd.With this command you set a character string in
each line starting with the current line till
the end of the workspace.
The character string will start in the column,
which is set by the 'BNDS' primary command.
The data, which was there will be overwritten.
:dt.FILL /str/n,m
:dd.This FILL command will only affect the line range n,m
:dt.HAR xxxxxx,n,m
:dd.Print the lines n till m on printer with
name xxxxxx. If n and m are omitted the lines
on the current screen will be printed.
The printer will be acquired during this command
after successful hardcopy the message
'HARDCOPY MADE' will appear.
:dt.HAR xxxxxx,*,n
:dd.Print n lines on printer xxxxxxx starting with
the first line on the screen.
If n=99999999 the current line till the end of
the workspace will be printed
:dt.HAR xxx,n,m, TITLE/NOTITLE, EJECT/NOEJECT, INDENT/NOINDENT,
C=nn,P=nn, F='text', SCS,DSC
:dd.With 'EJECT' you can skip after every 'nn' lines
(nn is value in the 'P' operand). 'EJECT' is default.
.br
With 'TITLE', you can print headers on each page
default is 'NOTITLE'.
.br
With 'c=nn' you can print 'nn' copies (default 1).
.br
With the keyword 'INDENT' the print will be
shifted 8 positions to the right.
Default is 'NOINDENT'.
.br
The printer name and line numbers are positional
parameters, the rest are keywords.
.br
With F='text' a footnote will be printed at
the bottom of each page. 'text' has a maximum
length of 80 and should be specified between
apostrophes.
.br
'SCS' (lutype1) or 'DSC' (lutype 0 or 3) should
be specified if the printer is cross domain used.
:dt.HELP
:dd.Invoke the RPF HELP facility.
.br
See :hdref refid=help for more information concerning HELP
:dt.I m,n
:dd.Insert n blank lines after line m or insert n lines
after the first line on the screen (specify m=*).
If n is omitted 1 line will be inserted after line
m or current line if m=*.
After a successful insertion the workspace will be
renumbered and the cursor will be set in the first inserted line.
.br
The line numbers of the inserted lines will be highlighted, until
data is entered in an inserted line. You do not need to delete
unused lines. The highlighted lines (the inserted lines without data)
will not be saved (with the END or SAVE primary command) or submitted
(with the SUBMIT primary command). This is the way like
VM XEDIT it does.
:dt.L +nnn/L -nnn
:dd.Skip :hp2.nnn:ehp2. lines forward or backward.
If you are at the top of the screen
and you enter 'L -nnn' or you are at the bottom
of the workspace and you enter 'L +nnn',
the command will be ignored.
:dt.JCL
:dd.Do a syntax check of the JCL if you are editing a member
containing JCL. The usually used JCL parameters will be checked.
:dt.L nnn
:dd.Locate the screen at line nnn.
After execution of this command line nnn will be
the first line on the screen (the current line).
If line nnn does not exist in the data set, an error
message will be produced and the command ignored.
:dt.LC x y
:dd.Translate the lines x-y to lower case (between line-x and
line-y) within the EDIT boundaries. If x (and y) are
omitted, translation will be done from the current line until
the end of the workspace.
After execution an implicit 'CAPS OFF' command will be executed.
:dt.LEFT
:dd.Scroll to the left depending on the SCROLL value (PAGE,
HALF or CSR)
:dt.MO n,m,o
:dd.Copy linerange n till m after line o.
.br
If you specify n=* the current line till line m will be copied.
The original lines n till m will be deleted after
successful copy.
If 'o' is omitted line n will be moved after line m.
.br
If the MO command cannot be executed, a suitable
error message will be displayed.
After successful move the workspace will be renumbered.
:dt.NUMBER OFF or NUM OFF
:dd.Set the editor in 'NONUM' mode without changing line numbers.
:dt.NUMBER ON or NUM ON
:dd.Set the editor in Numbered mode. The data will be renumbered.
See also the RENUMBER primary command.
:dt.NULLS ON/OFF
:dd.Replace the trailing blanks on the screen by terminal
erase characters if ON is used. This provides an easy way
to use the insert mode of the terminal.
With NULLS OFF the erase characters will be replaced by blanks.
:dt.OUT
:dd.Invoke the RPF output processor. See :hdref refid=outp for more
information about the OUT primary command.
:dt.OVLY m,n(,o)
:dd.Copy line m over line n or over line range n - o.
If you specify m=*, the current line will be used.
In the lines n through the blanks will be replaced with the
characters of the same column of line m (the overlay function).
Only the character within the EDIT boundaries will be overlaid.
:dt.PASTE
:dd.Copy the clipboard file after line marked with 'A' (see
:hdref refid=eline for the line commands), or before the first line
(line command TT) or after the last line (line command BB).
You can PASTE the clipboard file multiple times until the next
CUT primary command.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display and/or alter PFK settings.
Press ENTER to perform the changes.
If finished press PF03/PF15.
:lblbox.Note.
The changed PFKs are only effective
during this RPF session. To change the
default PFKs use the session default menu (see :hdref refid=def ).
:elblbox.
:dt.PRINT n,m PRINT *,n or PRINT
:dd.Print lines n thru m to a temporary data set, print n lines
from current line (first line on screen) or print current
screen if PRINT is issued without operands.
If n=99999999 in PRINT *,n, the current line until the end of
data will be printed.
.br
After successful PRINT, Browse will be invoked. In BROWSE,
you can print the data to a SYSOUT class.
:dt.PROF
:dd.Toggle display of the PROFILE-line in the editor.
.br
The PROFILE-line contains the status about Numbered YES or NO,
Cobol ON or OFF, Caps ON or OFF, NULLS ON or OFF, and AUTOSAVE
ON or OFF.
:dt.R m,n
:dd.Repeat line m, n times.
.br
If m=* the first line on the screen will be repeated n times.
If n is omitted 1 line will be repeated behind line
m or current line if m=*.
After a successful repetition the workspace will be
renumbered and the cursor will be set in the first
repeated line.
:lblbox.Note.
If n=99999999 the first line on the
screen till the end of the workspace will be deleted.
If the entire workspace is deleted, RPF
will terminate EDIT.
:elblbox.
:dt.RENUMBER
:dd.Renumber the last 8 columns in the workspace starting
with 100 and a increment of 100 if in standard
mode, columns 01-06 in the workspace starting
with 100 and a increment of 100 if in COBOL mode or
columns 1-8 in the workspace starting with 100 and
a increment of 100 if the data set has variable records.
Aliases of RENUMBER are 'REN', 'NUM' or 'RENUM'.
.br
If the data was not line numbered before the RENUM command,
a warning with text 'Data will be lost' will be issued.
After hitting ENTER the message 'Renumber 'Yes' or 'No''
will be issued. Reply with indication action to renumber or not.
:dt.REPLACE
:dd.Save a range of lines with line commands 'CC -- CC', CB or CT
into a data set or member with the REPLACE option. An alias of
REPLACE is REP.
See primary command CREATE for an explanation of the SAVE
menu, that is displayed. The only exception is the default option.
That will be option 2 (RE-USE).
:dt.RESET
:dd.Clear the pending line-commands and set the reversed
line numbers to non-reversed. RESET may be abbreviated as
RES.
:dt.RETRIEVE
:dd.Read the previous entered EDIT primary commands.
The last 100 commands are saved in the profile data set with
member name @RPFRTRV.
Any subsequent RETRIEVE will give you the previous
command. The last entered primary command is the first command to
be retrieved.
:dt.RETURN
:dd.Terminate the editor and always return to the
main menu. The data will be saved if changes are made.
:dt.RIGHT
:dd.Scroll to the right depending on the SCROLL value (PAGE,
HALF or CSR).
.br
It has no sense to change the last 8 columns on the screen,
if you are in 'NUM' mode.
:dt.SAVE
:dd.SAVE the workspace in a data set.
The EDIT workspace will be saved in the same data set/member.
No prompting will be done. To save the data with prompting, use
the CREATE or REPLACE primary command.
After SAVE, RPF stays in the editor.
:dt.SORT
:dd.Sort the workspace.
.br
The entire workspace is sorted; the sort fields
is set by the 'BNDS' primary command. After successful
sort, the workspace is renumbered.
:dt.SUB
:dd.Submit the workspace to the job execution queue.
With this command you are able to execute jobs in the background.
After successful submit the user will be notified
with the message 'JOB jjjjjjjj SUBMITTED'.
The TSO command processor SUBMIT will be used to submit the job.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Display first screen of the data set.
An alias of the TOP command is 'T'.
:dt.TSO
:dd.Invoke the RPF-TSO command processor.
With this command it is possible to enter TSO commands
during edit. If you leave the TSO command processor
with 'END' RPF will go back to the EDIT mode.
See :hdref refid=tso
:dt.UC x y
:dd.Translate the lines x-y to upper case (between line-x and
line-y) within the EDIT boundaries. If x (and y) are
omitted, translation will be done from the current line until
the end of the workspace.
:dt.UNNUM
:dd.Remove the line numbers in the last 8 columns if in standard
mode, columns 1-6 if in COBOL mode or columns 1-8 if the data set
contains variable records.
.br
The line numbers on the screen will NOT be removed.
.br
This command may be abbreviated as 'UNN'
This primary command is only allowed if the editor
is in 'NUM' mode, otherwise the primary command will
be ignored with the message:
Workspace not numbered
After execution of 'UNNUM' the editor will be set in 'NONUM' mode.
:dt.UP
:dd.Scroll backward depending on the scroll value on
the screen. The scroll value is described in the DOWN command.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the
'UP' command is given by means of a PFK the
'TOP' command will be executed.
.br
If you enter 'nnnnn' (max 5 positions 0-9) and the SCB command has
been given by means of a PFK,
'nnnnn' lines will be scrolled backward.
:edl.
:h3 id=eline. EDIT line commands.
:p.
The line commands should be entered in the line number fields
of the lines, which should be manipulated with these commands.
The line commands can be entered in any place in the line number
field
The following line commands are available:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Line command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.Inn
:dd.Insert nn lines after the specified line.
nn blank lines will be inserted and the cursor
will be placed in the first inserted line.
If only an 'I' is entered, 1 line will be
inserted.
.br
The line numbers of the inserted lines will be highlighted
(see also the I primary command)
:dt.R nn
:dd.Repeat the specified line nn times and the cursor
will be placed in the first repetition of that
line. If only an 'R' is entered the line will
be repeated once.
:dt.RR...RR
:dd.Repeat a block of lines between the lines marked
with 'RR'. if only once 'RR' is entered the
line command will wait for the second 'RR'
and a pending message will be issued.
:dt.C.....A
:dd.Copy line marked with 'C' after the line marked
with 'A'. If the line command is not complete
(only the 'A' or the 'C' is entered), the command
will be set pending.
:dt.C.....O
:dd.Copy line marked with 'C' over the line marked
with 'O'. If the line command is not complete
(only the 'O' or the 'C' is entered), the command
will be set pending.
:dt.C....OO...OO
:dd.Copy line marked with 'C' over the line range marked
with 'OO -- OO'. If the line command is not complete
(only the 'OO' or the 'C' is entered), the command
will be set pending.
:dt.CC...CC...A
:dd.Copy the block of lines between 'CC' after line
'A'. The command will be set pending if it is not
complete.
:dt.CC...CC...BB
:dd.Copy the block of lines between 'CC' after the
last line. 'BB' can be placed in any line.
:dt.CC...CC...TT
:dd.Copy the block of lines between 'CC' before the
first line. 'TT' can be placed in any line.
:dt.CT...A
:dd.Copy the first line until the line marked with 'CT'
after line 'A'.
:dt.CB...A
:dd.copy the line marked with 'CB' until the bottom line
after line 'A'.
:dt.M.....A
:dd.Move line marked with 'C' after the line marked
with 'A'. If the line command is not complete
(only the 'A' or the 'N' is entered), the command
will be set pending.
:dt.MM...MM...A
:dd.Move the block of lines between 'MM' after line
'A'. The command will be set pending if it is not complete.
:dt.MM...MM...BB
:dd.Move the block of lines between 'MM' after the
last line. 'BB' can be placed in any line.
:dt.MM...MM...TT
:dd.Move the block of lines between 'MM' before the
first line. 'TT' can be placed in any line.
:dt.MT...A
:dd.Move the first line until the line marked with 'MT'
after line 'A'.
:dt.MB...A
:dd.Move the line marked with 'MB' until the bottom line after line 'A'.
:dt.D
:dd.Delete specified line.
:dt.DD...DD
:dd.Delete the specified block of lines.
:dt.DT
:dd.Delete the block of lines starting with the top
line until the line marked with 'DT'.
:dt.DB
:dd.Delete the block of lines starting with the line
marked with 'DB' until the bottom line.
:dt.LC
:dd.Translate specified line to lower-case.
:dt.LCC..LCC
:dd.Translate the specified block of lines to lower-case
:dt.LCB
:dd.Translate the block of lines to lower-case starting with the line
marked with 'LCB' until the bottom line.
:dt.LCT
:dd.Translate the block of lines to lower-case starting with the top
line until the line marked with 'LCT'.
:dt.UC
:dd.Translate specified line to upper-case.
:dt.UCC..UCC
:dd.Translate the specified block of lines to upper-case.
:dt.UCB
:dd.Translate the block of lines to upper-case starting with the line
marked with 'UCB' until the bottom line.
:dt.UCT
:dd.Translate the block of lines to upper-case starting with the top
line until the line marked with 'UCT'.
:dt.RESET
:dd.Reset the pending line commands.
'RESET' is also valid as primary command.
:edl.
:lblbox.Note.
The block of lines specified, need not to be in the same screen.
Example: You can enter 'CC' in the first screen, scroll 2
screens, enter the second 'CC', scroll again some
screens and enter the 'A'.
:elblbox.
:p.
:lblbox.Notes of EDIT.
:ol.
:li.EDIT supports data sets or members with a record length
from 40 bytes up to 255 bytes. Data sets and members with
a record format of fixed or variable are supported.
:li.You can set all your RPF EDIT commands in PFK's, so you can
press the corresponding PFK to enter a command.
:li.Line commands can work together with the primary commands:
BOTTOM, CREATE, CUT, DOWN, F, L, LEFT, M, PASTE, REPLACE, RESET,
RIGHT, TOP and UP.
.br
Example: If a line command is pending only the PFK's can be
used for scrolling.
:li.Upon SAVE of the data, the empty inserted lines (marked
a red line number) are not saved.
:li.If the workspace size is too small for the data set, the EDIT
will be terminated and the message 'Workspace too small'
will appear in the data set selection screen or PDS screen.
To increase the workspace size use the defaults menu
:li.If the data set contains unprintable characters the user
will be notified with the message 'Invalid chars xlated'.
The translated characters will be changed into periods
('.'). The translated line will be highlighted and protected.
:eol.
:elblbox.
:h3 id=libu. LIBRARIAN update.
:p.
The LIBRARIAN update menu is selected with option 3 on the SAVE
menu.
The screen is divided into 8 parts.
:ol c.
:li.The header line
:li.The menu (select 1,2 or 3) to ADD,REPLACE or DLM LIBRARIAN
modules.
:li.The DESC field (only valid for ADD and REPLACE)
:li.The PGMR field (only valid for ADD and REPLACE)
:li.The LANG field (only valid for ADD and REPLACE)
:li.The LIBRARIAN module.
:li.The LIBRARIAN master file.
:li.The volume on which the master file resides.
:eol.
If you have altered the fields and selected a function on the
menu the data set will be allocated and the LIBRARIAN will be
invoked.
:p.
After completion of the LIBRARIAN, RPF will BROWSE the
LIBRARIAN output.
It is recommended to check this output, but the 'OSJOB' error
can be ignored.
:p.
If an error is detected by RPF a suitable message will be
displayed and retry is possible.
Press PF03/PF15 to escape from this screen.
:h3 id=archu. ARCHIVER update.
:p.
If you select option 4 on the RPF save menu, the ARCHIVER
menu will be selected by RPF.
The screen is divided into 6 parts.
:ol c.
:li.The header line
:li.The item field.
:li.The item group field or blank.
:li.The item subgroup field or blank.
:li.The item type field or blank.
:li.The Archiver VSAM cluster data set name.
:eol.
:p.
After having altered the fields and chosen the right option,
the data set will be allocated and Rick Fochtman's ARCHIVER
will be invoked.
:p.
After completion of the Archiver, RPF will browse the
Archiver output. It is recommended to check this output.
:p.
If an error is detected by RPF a suitable message will be
displayed and retry is possible.
Press PF03/PF15 to escape from this screen.
:h2.RPF utility functions.
:p.
If you enter '3' on the RPF main menu, the utility menu appears.
you can select the following functions:
:ul c.
:li.Option 0. Reset or delete RPF or ISPF statistics.
:li.Option 1. Library Functions.
:li.Option 2. Create or delete data sets (data set functions).
:li.Option 3. Move/Copy sequential data sets or members of partitioned
data sets.
:li.Option 4. VTOC and data set list functions.
:li.Option 5. Perform LIBRARIAN maintenance.
:li.Option 6. Invoke the RPF output processor.
:li.Option 7. Invoke Greg Price' IMON processor.
:li.Option 8. Search data sets for strings of data.
:li.Option 9. Edit, browse, print, rename and delete ARCHIVER
items. ARCHIVER is a component that archives members and/or
data sets into 1 VSAM archive cluster.
:eul.
:p.
To leave the utility menu enter 'X' to go back to the main menu.
:p.
It is also possible to select the utility functions directly from
the RPF main menu, without interference of the utility menu (e.g.
select '3.1' for PDS-maintenance). If the utility is terminated in
this case, RPF always returns to the main menu.
:xmp.
------------------------------ RPF Utility menu -------------------------------
Option  ===>
                                                             User ID - A0611
  0  RESET        Reset/Delete ISPF/RPF statistics
  1  LIBRARY      Library (PDS) Functions
  2  DATA SET     Create or Delete data sets
  3  MOVE/COPY    Move or copy data sets or members
  4  DS LIST      Perform VTOC and catalog functions
  5  LIBRARIAN    Perform LIBRARIAN maintenance
  6  OUTPUT       Invoke the output processor
  7  IMON         Interactive monitor of Greg Price
  8  SEARCH       Search data sets for strings of data
  9  ARCHIVER     Process archived members
  X  EXIT         Return to MAIN menu
:exmp.
:p.
Figure 2. RPF Utility menu
:h3 id=reset. Reset/Delete ISPF or RPF statistics
If you select '0' on the RPF utility menu or '3.0' on the
RPF main menu, a data entry screen for the desired
partitioned data set will be displayed.
You can specify a New User ID, a new ISPF/RPF version number and
a new ISPF/RPF modification level and you can change the 'Data set
name' and 'Volume serial' fields or select a data set from 1 of the
8 selection fields.
If '=n(.n)' is entered in the data set name,
RPF returns to the main menu and executes option n(.n).
.br
Press ENTER to perform the allocation.  If the allocation is
not successful an error message will be displayed in the message area
and retry can be done. Press PF03 or PF15 to cancel Reset statistics.
:p.
After successful allocation, the RPF Reset member list will be
displayed.
.br
To reset a member to the New User ID, new Version and new
modification level, enter an 'S' before the member name.
You will be responded with the message :hp2.'RESET':ehp2. in the
comments area.
:p.
To delete the ISPF or SPF statistics of a member, enter a
'D' before the member name.
You will be responded with the message
:hp2.'ISPF/RPF stats deleted':ehp2. in the comments area.
.br
If you want to see the member before reset or delete ISPF stats,
select line command 'B' to browse the member.
.br
See :hdref refid=pdsm for more information concerning the member list.
:h3 id=pdsm. Library Functions.
:p.
If you select '1' on the RPF utility menu or '3.1' on the
RPF main menu,
a data entry screen for the desired partitioned data set
will be displayed. You can change the 'Data set name' and
'Volume serial' fields and set the atribute 'Confirm member delete'
to / or to <blank>. If '=n(.n)' is entered in the data set name,
RPF returns to the main menu and executes option n(.n).
.br
Press ENTER to perform the allocation. If the allocation is
not successful, an error message will be displayed in the message area
and retry can be done. Press PF03 or PF15 to cancel Library functions.
:p.
After successful allocation, the RPF Library Functions
selection panel will be displayed.
This panel is divided into 5 parts:
:ul c.
:li.The header line.
:li.The message area.
:li.The command area for the commands.
:li.The PDS description field.
:li.The member area.
:eul.
Each line of the member area contains the following fields:
:ul.
:li.The line command. This is an input field.
Valid line-commands are:
:ol c.
:li.'A': Assign an alias to the member
:li.'B': Browse the member.
:li.'D': Delete the member.
:li.'E': Edit the member.
:li.'F': Archive the member in Rick Fochtman's ARCHIVER
:li.'P': Print the member to the default SYSOUT class.
:li.'R': Rename the member.
:li.'S': Select the member for Browse if invoked from Browse in
the main menu or from Library Functions in the utility menu. Select
for EDIT if invoked from EDIT in the main menu.
:li.'V': View the member.
:eol.
:li.The member name. This field is protected.
:li.The newname field for the 'A' and 'R' operation. this is
an input field.
:li.The comments field. This is a protected field.
This field contains the RPF statistics in the directory
or a response to the operations entered in field 1.
The RPF statistics are set by the 'SAVE' command in the
RPF editor and are in the same format as the IBM's ISPF
statistics. The statistics will only be set if they are
not already present. If present then the modification
level will be increased by 1.
If the statistics are not present or a new member has been
created, RPF will add statistics in the same format as
IBM's ISPF statistics, and the version number is set to 01.
.br
The fields in the statistics are:
:ul c.
:li.TTR of member
:li.Owner of the member. 8 bytes containing the userid.
:li.Version:modification level. 5 bytes containing "vv:mm"
:li.Date created. 10 bytes containing "yyyy/mm/dd".
:li.Date last updated. 10 bytes containing "yyyy/mm/dd"
:li.Time last updated. 8 bytes containing "hh&colon.mm&colon.ss"
:li.Current number of records. 5 bytes.
:li.Initial number of records. 5 bytes (If the screen width is 92
bytes or more).
:li.Modified number of records. 5 bytes (If the screen width is 92
bytes or more).
:eul.
.br
If the library is a loadlib or program object library the
following will be displayed.
:ul c.
:li.The TTR of the member.
:li.C byte containing the length of the directory entry and some
flags (Scatter load and Alias indicator).
:li.The size of the load module in HEX.
:li.The true name if the load module is an alias.
:li.The authorization code (AC) of the load module.
:li.The addressing mode of the load module (24, 31, 64 or ANY)
:li.The residency mode of the load module (24 or ANY)
:li.Additional attributes (re-entrant, re-usable, refreshable
scatter load, overlay, not-executable and/or Entry Point Zero).
:eul.
:li.The alias/update indicator. This is a protected field.
The field contains 'ALIAS' if the member is an alias
or blanks.
If the member is update today, the comment field
(field 4) is higlighted.
:eul.
The RPF Library Functions primary commands are:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.=n or =n.n
:dd.Terminate PDS, return to main and execute option 'n' or
'n.n'.
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display the last screen of the directory listing.
This command may be abbreviated as 'B'
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Display the next screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'DOWN' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
:dt.END or RETURN
:dd.Terminate Library Functions. RPF will return to
the utility allocation menu with 'END' or main menu with
the 'RETURN' command
:dt.HELP
:dd.Display a screen with HELP information about the primary
commands and line-commands.
:dt.L 'string'
:dd.Locate 'string' in the member name, TTR, date/time updated,
or records. The to be compared field depends on the sort order
of the workspace (See SORT primary command).
Specify 1-16 characters in the 'string' operand).
.br
After successful execution of the command, RPFPDS
will display the screen, where the first line con-
tains the member, where the first occurrence
of 'string' was found (highlighted).
If no string is specified the command will be
ignored and the message: 'No string specified' is issued.
:dt.LEFT
:dd.Show left part of the member entries on a narrow screen.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen. you can alter here your PFK
settings. To alter the PFKs press ENTER.
To leave PFK press PF03/PF15.
:lblbox.Note
The changed PFK settings are only valid
during this RPF session. To change the PFK's in the RPF Profile
data set, select the defaults menu. (0 on the main menu)
:elblbox.
:dt.PRINT
:dd.Copy the member list in a temporary data set and invoke
the browse processor. In browse you have the PRINT command to
print this listing in a SYSOUT class.
:dt.RESET
:dd.Reset all outstanding messages.
The member list will be rebuild, all queued members
be reset and the members deleted by an 'D'
line-command will be removed.
:dt.RIGHT
:dd.Show right part of the member entries on a narrow screen.
:dt.S member
:dd.EDIT the specified member. If the member does not exist
EDIT will be invoked with an input screen to create the member.
.br
If the PDS selection list has been entered from BROWSE or Library
Functions (option 1 in the main menu or option 1 in the utility menu),
the specified member will be browsed. If in this case the member is
not found an error message will be displayed and the command
will be repeated.
:dt.SORT
:dd.Sort the members on member name (default).
:dt.SORT CHA
:dd.Sort the members on date/time last updated instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to find the
last changes. This sort is in DESCENDING order.
:dt.SORT SIZE
:dd.Sort the members on number of records instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to find the
last smallest or biggest members. This sort is in DESCENDING order.
:dt.SORT TTR
:dd.Sort the members on TTR - order instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to find the
members and its associated aliases. This sort is in DESCENDING order.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the directory listing. An alias
is 'T'.
:dt.TSO
:dd.Invoke the RPF TSO command processor to give TSO commands.
:dt.UP
:dd.Display the previous screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'UP' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'TOP' command will be executed.
:dt.XMIT nje name/userid
:dd.Transmit the queued members (with the X line command) to
NJE node/userid or Nickname. The TSO command TRANSMIT or XMIT will
be used to transmit the members. In the receiving node you can
issue the TSO command RECEIVE to receive the members.
.br
XMIT works only on systems with TSO/E or NJE38 installed.
:edl.
:lblbox.Note
All these commands can be set under PFK's. Press the
corresponding PFK to execute the command.
If you enter a command and one or more line commands in the
member area, the line commands will be executed first.
:elblbox.
:p.
Explanation of the line commands in the member area.
The following commands can be issued:
:dl.
:dt.A
:dd.Assign an alias.  Type in the 'newname'
field too. The response can be:
:ul c.
:li.Alias assigned, after successful assignment,
:li.Access denied, Update on PDS rejected by security system.
:li.Newname omitted or invalid, The newname is invalid or not
specified.
:li.STOW Error, if the operation is
unsuccessful.  Possible errors are:  member deleted
by previous 'D', 'newname' already exists,
insufficient space in directory, insufficient
virtual storage or trying to assign an alias in a PDS/E.
:eul.
:dt.B
:dd.Display the member, BROWSE will be invoked.
See :hdref refid=brw for more information concerning browse
The following responses can appear:
:ul c.
:li.Browsed, successful display.
:li.Member not found, the member was deleted by a
previous 'D' operation.
:li.Browse not available, The specified data set has a
record length > 255.
:eul.
:dt.D
:dd.Delete the specified member.
RPF will ask for confirmation if the attribute 'Confirm member delete'
is set to '/', with the confirmation panel.
If you press ENTER, delete will be performed.
If the PF03 or PF15 key is used, the member won't be deleted.
.br
If the attribute 'Confirm member delete' is set to <blank>, the
member will be deleted unconditionally.
.br
The possible responses are:
:ul c.
:li.Deleted, a successful delete
:li.Access denied, Update on PDS rejected by security system.
:li.Error in DELETE, The delete is unsuccessful.
(delete is confirmed)
:li.Not deleted, the confirmation panel is ended
with PF03 or PF15.
:eul.
:dt.E
:dd.EDIT the member with the RPF editor.
This member will be edited with the default
options. See :hdref refid=edit to get an explanation
of the EDIT functions. After termination of the
editor with the 'SAVE' or 'END' primary command in EDIT,
RPF will return to the selection list.
If the member is saved in the same member and
data set the userdata field will be updated upon
return to the PDS member selection list and the comments field will
be highlighted.
.br
After EDIT the following responses can be found
in the comment field.
:ul c.
:li.Edited, Successful edit.
:li.I/O error. Unrecoverable error detected.
:li.Updated/Replaced, Member updated due to EDIT
(can be another member)
:li.Created. Member added due to EDIT (can be another member)
:li.Member not found. Member deleted by previous 'D' operation.
:li.EDIT not available. PDS has a record length of >= 255
and/or the RECFM is :hp2.not:ehp2. F(B) or V(B).
:li.Data set/Member in use, The data set and member name
cannot be edited, because another TSO-user is busy with
EDIT of the same data set and member with RPF or with
the IBM product ISPF.
:li.Workspace too small, The EDIT is terminated due to this reason.
Increase the workspace size in the defaults menu.
:li.No temporary data set, Library Functions are unable
to save the workspace, because the allocation of the
save data set is failed.
This error is already detected upon start of RPF
with the message: 'Init error RC= 0024'
:eul.
:lblbox.Note
It is possible, that both messages 'Edited' and
'Created' or 'Updated/Replaced' are present in this
PDS screen. This will be archieved by saving the
edited member in another member in the same PDS.
Example: member 'A' is selected with an 'E' before
the member. In EDIT the member is saved into 'B',
that was not present in this PDS. After completion,
the message after member 'A' was 'Edited' and
member 'B' is now present in the directory, with
the message 'Created'.
:elblbox.
:dt.F
:dd.Archive the member in the VSAM Archive cluster.
Possible responses are:
:ul c.
:li.Archived, member successfully saved onto the Archive.
:li.Not Archived, Archive menu exited with PF03/PF15.
:li.ARCHIVER not installed.
:dt.R
:dd.Rename the specified member. Type in the 'newname'
field too. The response can be:
:ul c.
:li.Renamed, after successful rename,
:li.Access denied, Update on PDS rejected by security system.
:li.Newname omitted or invalid,
The newname is invalid or not specified or
:li.Error in RENAME, if the rename is unsuccessful.
possible errors are:  member deleted by previous
'D', 'newname' already exists, insufficient space in
directory, or insufficient virtual storage.
:eul.
:dt.P
:dd.Print the specified member in the default SYSOUT class.
The responses can be:
:ul c.
:li.Printed, successful print of the member.
:li.Member not found, the member is deleted by a previous 'D' operation.
:li.Alloc error SYSOUT, severe error. contact RPF support.
:eul.
:dt.S
:dd.Select the specified member. The 'S' line-command is only
valid, if the member selection list has been invoked by
BROWSE (option 1) EDIT (option 2), Reset (option 3.0) or Library.
(option 3.1) from the main menu.
:dt.V
:dd.Display the member with the editor in VIEW mode.
See :hdref refid=edit for more information concerning view.
The following responses can appear:
:ul c.
:li.Viewed, successful display.
:li.Member not found, the member was deleted by a
previous 'D' operation.
:li.Edit/View not available, The specified data set has a
record length > 255 or RECFM = not F(B) or V(B).
:eul.
:dt.X
:dd.Queue the member to the XMIT queue. You can queue more than 1
member.
.br
You will be notified with the response 'Queued for transmission'
:edl.
:p.
If the line command is not 'A', 'D', 'E', 'F', 'P',
'R', 'S', 'V', 'X' or blank the message:
'Select A,B,D,E,F,P,R,S,V or X' will be set in the
comments field for that member.
:lblbox.Note
If you terminate Library Functions you can EDIT
your member list with the editor in 'NONUM' mode
you can do it as follows:
:ol c.
:li.Terminate Library Functions with 'END'.
:li.Terminate utility menu with 'X' (PF03/PF15).
:li.Select -2- on main menu and change options,
but always CLEAR the dsname field.
:li.Press ENTER to EDIT the member list.
:eol.
:elblbox.
:h3 id=allo.Data set functions
:p.
If you select '2' on the RPF utility menu or '3.2' on the RPF
main menu, you get a data entry screen.
.br
You can change the following fields on the screen:
:ol.
:li.The option: Specify 'A' for creation, 'D' for deletion or
or PF03/PF15 to return.
:li.The Prefix: The first qualifier of the TSO library.
:li.The Library: The second qualifier of the TSO library.
:li.The Type: The third qualifier of the TSO library.
:li.Other data set: A fully qualified data set name. If this data set
name is specified, PREFIX, LIBRARY and TYPE are ignored.
:li.The unit name: The default is SYSDA.
:li.The record format: specify F, FB, FBM, FBA, FBS, V, VB, VBM, VBA,
VBS or U.
:li.Volume serial: The volume on which the data set must reside.
If the volume is omitted, a storage volume will be used.
:li.The LRECL: Specify a value between 18 and 32760. The value '0' is
only allowed if RECFM=U. If LRECL is omitted or '0' and RECFM is not
U, LRECL will be defaulted to 80.
:li.Space unit: Specify here 'CYL', 'TRK' or 'BLK'
:li.The BLKSIZE: Specify a value between 18 and 32767.
BLKSIZE should be a multiple of LRECL if RECFM=F(B/A/M/S).
If RECFM=V(B/A/M), the BLKSIZE should be at least LRECL+4.
If BLKSIZE is omitted or '0', BLKSIZE has been defaulted to LRECL
for fixed records, to LRECL+4 for variable records or to 6144 for
RECFM=U.
:li.Primary: The primary space of the data set in cylinders,
tracks or blocks.
:li.Secondary: The secondary space of the data set or zero if
you don't want a secondary space.
:li.The number of directory blocks.
If you specify zero a sequential data set will
be created, otherwise a partitioned data set will be created.
:eol.
For option D (DELETE) only items 1-4 are used.
.sp
If you press ENTER the data set will be created and the allocation
panel will be redisplayed with the message:
'Data set allocated' or 'Data set deleted' in the message area.
.br
If an error occurs during allocation retry will be performed and
a suitable error message will be displayed.
.br
With option D, RPF will ask for confirmation of delete the data set.
With PF12/PF24 the data set will be deleted. With PF03/PF15
the deletion will be rejected.
:p.
The 'SPACE UNIT' and 'PRIMARY' fields are required. If 'Other
data set' is not specified, PREFIX and LIBRARY also are required.
The 'PREFIX', 'LIBRARY' and 'TYPE' fields may contain more than
1 data set level.
:h3.Move/Copy sequential data sets or members in partitioned data sets
:p.If you select '3' on the utility menu or '3.3' on the main menu, a
data entry screeen will be presented. In this screen
you can specify the FROM data set and the TO data set.
Both data sets should be sequential or
partitioned an should have the same RECFM en LRECL. If the data set
has a RECFM=U (usually for a LOAD library), the
BLKSIZE of the TO data set should be equal or larger than the
BLKSIZE of the FROM data set.
.br
In the menu, you can specify the option (M for Move or C for Copy),
the data set names of both data sets and the volumes if the
data sets are not cataloged.
.br
The last parameter is Replace like members YES/NO. You can alter
this parameter to force replacement of the
members yes or no. The default can be specified in the defaults menu of
option 0.1. This parameter is ignored if the data sets are sequential.
:p.
Sequential data sets will be immediately copied and a message with
the number of records copied will be displayed and the allocation
menu is re-displayed.
:p.
If '(*)' is specified immediately after the data set name of the
FROM data set, all members of this data set will be copied/moved to
the TO data set, depending on the REPLACE parameter. The user will be
notified how many members are copied or moved and the data entry
screen will be re-displayed.
:p.If no '(*)' is specified, a member selection list is
displayed. Each line of the list contains the following.
:ul.
:li.The line command. This is an input field. The only line command
= 'S'
:li.The member name. This field is protected.
:li.The newname field to rename the member after Move or Copy.
:li.The comments field. This is a protected field. This field contains
the RPF statistics in the directory or a response
of the S command entered in field 1. See :hdref refid=pdsm
for a description of the RPF or ISPF
statistics.
:eul.
The Move/Copy commands are&colon.
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.=n or =n.n
:dd.Terminate Move/Copy, return to main and execute option 'n' or
'n.n'.
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display the last screen of the directory listing.
This command may be abbreviated as 'B'
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Display the next screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'DOWN' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
:dt.END or RETURN
:dd.Terminate Move/Copy. RPF will return to
the allocation menu with 'END' or main menu with
the 'RETURN' command
:dt.L 'string'
:dd.Locate 'string' in the member name.
.br
After successful execution of the command, Move/Copy
will display the screen, where the first line con-
tains the member, where the first occurrence
of 'string' was found (highlighted).
If no string is specified, the command will be ignored
and the message 'No string specified' is issued.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen. you can alter here your PFK
settings. To alter the PFKs press ENTER.
To leave PFK press PF03/PF15.
:lblbox.Note
The changed PFK settings are only valid
during this RPF session. To change the PFKs in the RPF profile
data set, select the defaults menu. (0 on the main menu)
:elblbox.
:dt.RESET
:dd.Reset all outstanding messages.
The member list will be rebuild, all queued members
members be reset and the members deleted by an 'D'
line-command will be removed.
:dt.SORT
:dd.Sort the members on member name (default).
:dt.SORT CHA
:dd.Sort the members on date/time last updated instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to move/copy the members with the
last changes. This sort is in DESCENDING order.
:dt.SORT SIZE
:dd.Sort the members on number of records instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to find the
last smallest or biggest members. This sort is in DESCENDING order.
:dt.SORT TTR
:dd.Sort the members on TTR - order instead of
alphabetic order, so it is easy to find the
members and its associated aliases. This sort is in DESCENDING order
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the directory listing.
.br
An alias is 'T'.
:dt.UP
:dd.Display the previous screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'UP' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'TOP' command will be executed.
:edl.
:lblbox.Note
All these commands can be set under PFKs. Press the corresponding
PFK to execute the command.
:elblbox.
:p.With the line command 'S', you can get the following responses.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Copied :ehp2.
The member has been successfully copied.
:li.:hp2.Moved :ehp2.
The member has been successfully copied and has been deleted from
the FROM data set.
:li.:hp2.Not deleted, no update access :ehp2.
The delete of the member during MOVE processing is blocked by a
security system like RACF.
:li.:hp2.Replaced :ehp2.
The member has been successfully copied or moved and member in
TO data set has been replaced.
:li.:hp2.Member not Replaced :ehp2.
A member with the same name has been found in the
TO data set and the parameter Replace
like members was set to NO.
:li.:hp2.'S' is the only valid line command :ehp2.
Another line command than S was entered.
:li.:hp2.Error in IEBCOPY, see output :ehp2.
The MOVE/COPY operation failed. The SYSPRINT
output of IEBCOPY will be browsed.
:li.:hp2.Unable to delete member :ehp2.
The STOW operation to delete the member of the
FROM data set failed.
:eul.
:h3 id=vtc. VTOC and data set list functions.
:p.
If you select '4' on the utility menu or '3.4' on the main menu,
you get a data entry screen for the desired data set qualifier,
volume serial and parm.
The screen contains 4 input fields:
:ol.
:li.The requested option (1,2 or V). Default is option 1.
:li.The data set level (a fuzzy qualifier). Example: level
SYS1 and SYS1.L are both valid.
:li.The name of the volume serial, which VTOC should be listed.
:li.The parm; 'SHORT' for a normal VTOC,  'LONG' for a VTOC
with an extra line with the full data set name (44 pos.) and
the startaddress of the specified data set or 'VOL' for VTOC
without header and trailer lines and instead of the creation date
the volume will be displayed.
:eol.
:p.
After having altered the data set level, volume and PARM press ENTER.
If only a data set level has been specified and option 1 is selected or
defaulted, the catalog will be searched with the specified data
set level.
.br
If the volume serial (and data set level) has been specified and
the volume is online, the screen will be locked
and the message 'VTOC running...' appears in the message area of the
screen.
:lblbox.Note
If PF03 or PF15 is pressed RPF will return to the VTOC
menu or main menu if '3.4' was selected.
:elblbox.
:p.
If VTOC or catalog processing has been finished, RPF will invoke
RPFVTOC1 for a data set selection
list in option 1 and will invoke the editor in NONUM
mode for option 2.
Here you have all the EDIT facilities. See :hdref refid=edit for
a description of the EDIT functions.
If you terminate the data set selection list or editor RPF returns
to the VTOC menu.
:p.
:hp2.Option 1:ehp2.
.br
In option 1, a data set selection list will be presented. In this list
the following information will be displayed for each data set:
:ol.
:li.The data set name
:li.The creation date if a volume has been specified or the volume
if only the data set level has been specified.
:li.The last reference date
:li.The record format
:li.The logical record length
:li.The block length
:li.The number of extents of the data set (max 123)
:li.The allocated space in tracks
:li.The free tracks inside the data set
:eol.
In this data set list you can issue then following primary or line
commands.
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.=n or =n.n
:dd.Terminate VTOC, return to main and execute option 'n' or
'n.n'.
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display the last screen of the directory listing.
This command may be abbreviated as 'B'
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Display the next screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'DOWN' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'BOTTOM' command will be executed.
:dt.END or RETURN
:dd.Terminate the data set selection list. RPF will go back to
the VTOC menu with 'END' or main menu with
the 'RETURN' command
:dt.HELP
:dd.Display a screen with HELP information about the primary
commands and line-commands.
:dt.L 'string'
:dd.Locate 'string' in the data set name
.br
After successful execution of the command, VTOC
will display the screen, where the first line contains
the data set, where the first occurrence
of 'string' was found (highlighted).
If no string is specified, the command will be ignored
and the message 'No string specified' is issued.
:dt.LEFT
:dd.Show left part on a narrow screen including data set name.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen. you can alter here your PFK
settings. To alter the PFKs press ENTER.
To leave PFK press PF03/PF15.
:lblbox.Note
The changed PFK settings are only valid
during this RPF session. To change the PFKs in the RPF profile
data set, select the defaults menu. (0 on the main menu)
:elblbox.
:dt.REFRESH
:dd.The data set list or VTOC list will be refreshed with
updated data.
:dt.RIGHT
:dd.Show right part on a narrow screen including data set name.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the directory listing.
.br
An alias is 'T'.
:dt.TSO
:dd.Execute TSO commands. Module RPFTSO will be invoked.
:dt.UP
:dd.Display the previous screen.
.br
If 'M' is entered in the command field and the 'UP' command is given
by means of a PFK, the 'TOP' command will be executed.
:edl.
:p.
Before the data set name you are able to enter line commands. The
The following line commands are possible&colon.
:dl.
:dt.A
:dd.Allocate a new data set, the ALLOC menu will be displayed.
In this menu the data set name, SPACE parameters and DCB parameters
are inherited from the data set in the data set list, where the
line command is given. See :hdref refid=allo for more
information about allocation of data sets.
:dt.B
:dd.Display the data set, BROWSE will be invoked. If the low
level qualifier of the data set is '.ZIP', RPF will try to invoke
the program MINIUNZ to UNZIP the data set. The output will be
browsed. If MINIUNZ is not found or the low level qualifier is
not '.ZIP', the selected original data set will be browsed.
.br
See .hdref refid=brw for more information concerning browse.
.br
The following responses can appear&colon
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Browsed:ehp2., successful display
:li.:hp2.Access denied:ehp2.. No permission (RACF) to access.
:li.:hp2.No temporary data set:ehp2., RPFVTC1 is not allococated
in RPFINIT. VTOC is unable to save the workspace. This error is
already detected upon start of RPF with the message
:hp2.'Init error Rc=0024':ehp2.
:li.:hp2.Browse/View not available:ehp2.. The specified data set has
record length longer then 255 bytes (except if RECFM=U).
:li.:hp2.Error in Browse/View:ehp2.. The data set cannot be browsed
due to an error.
:eul.
:dt.C
:dd.Catalog a data set. The following responses are possible&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Cataloged:ehp2.. The data set has been successfully
cataloged.
:li.:hp2.Data set already cataloged:ehp2.
:li.:hp2.VSAM data set:ehp2.. A VSAM component cannot be cataloged
in this way. Usually a VSAM data set is always cataloged.
:li.:hp2.Error in catalog processing:ehp2.. The catalog
function had abended for some reason.
:li.:hp2.Temporary data set:ehp2.. Temporary data sets should not be
cataloged.
:eul.
:dt.D
:dd.Delete the specified data set. RPF will display a
confirmation panel. If you press PF12/PF24, delete will be
performed. Pressing PF03/PF15 will reject the deletion.
.br
The possible responses are&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Deleted:ehp2., a successful delete
:li.:hp2.Scratch error:ehp2.. Data set is uncataloged, but cannot
be scratched. Re-catalog the data set with the 'C' line command
or scratch the data set with IEHPROGM.
:li.:hp2.VSAM data set:ehp2.. You try te delete
a VSAM component.
:li.:hp2.Error in delete:ehp2.. The delete is unsuccessful.
(delete is confirmed)
:li.:hp2.Deleted rejected by user:ehp2.. The confirmation panel
is ended with PF03/PF15.
:eul.
:dt.E
:dd.Edit the data set with the RPF editor. See .hdref refid=edit
for more information about EDIT. After EDIT the following responses
can be found in the comment field&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Edited:ehp2.. Successful edit.
:li.:hp2.Access denied:ehp2.. No permission (RACF) to access.
:li.:hp2.I/O error:ehp2.. Unrecoverable error detected.
:li.:hp2.Edit not available:ehp2.. Data set has a record length > 255
and the RECFM is :hp2.not:ehp2. F(B) or V(B).
:li.:hp2.Error in EDIT:ehp2.. The data set cannot be edited due
to an error.
:li.:hp2.No temporary data set:ehp2., VTOC is ubale to save the
workspace, because the allocation of the save data set has failed.
This error is
already detected upon start of RPF with the message
:hp2.'Init error rc=0024':ehp2.
:li.:hp2.Data set/member in use:ehp2. The data set and member name
cannot be edited, because another TSO-user is busy with
EDIT of the same data set and member with RPF or with
the IBM product ISPF.
:eul.
:dt.I
:dd.Display additional information of the data set.
Information like DCB information, allocation type (ABSTR, BLOCK,
TRACK or CYLINDER), number of tracks, free tracks in
the data set, volume and devicetype, number of allocated directory
blocks (if a PDS), free directory blocks and number of members
will be displayed.
You can leave the information screen with ENTER, PF03 or PF15.
The response of the 'I' line command is:
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Info - I:ehp2.. Information successfully displayed.
:eul.
:dt.M
:dd.Invoke Library Functions. A member selection will be displayed.
See :hdref refid=pdsm for more information about Library Functions.
After member list, the following responses can be found
in the comment field&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Member list:ehp2.. Member list successful processed
:li.:hp2.Member list not available:ehp2.. Data set is not partitioned
:li.:hp2.Access denied:ehp2.. No permission (RACF) to access.
:li.:hp2.Error processing member list:ehp2..
Member list cannot be created due to an error.
:li.:hp2.No temporary data set:ehp2., VTOC is ubale to save the
workspace, because the allocation of the save data set has failed.
This error is
already detected upon start of RPF with the message
:hp2.'Init error rc=0024':ehp2.
:eul.
:dt.R
:dd.Rename a data set. A RENAME panel will be displayed.
You can enter a valid newname. If you press ENTER, an attempt will
be made to rename the data set.
Cataloged data sets will be cataloged with the new name.
Rename is not possible for a multivolume data set or a VSAM data set.
In the rename panel a suitable message will be displayed if you
enters a wrong newname.
After RENAME, the following responses can be found
in the comment field&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Renamed:ehp2.. Data set successfully renamed.
:li.:hp2.Error in RENAME:ehp2.. The RENAME macro had suffered a
nonzero return code. Possible cause: data set in use or
user is not authorized to RENAME the data set.
:eul.
:dt.S
:dd.Display additional information of the data set.
Information like DCB information, allocation type (ABSTR, BLOCK,
TRACK or CYLINDER), number of tracks, free tracks in
the data set, volume and devicetype will be displayed.
Unlike the line command 'I', the involved data set will not
be opened, so the last reference date remains untouched.
You can leave the information screen with ENTER, PF03 or PF15.
The response of the 'S' line command is:
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Info - S:ehp2.. Information successfully displayed.
:eul.
:dt.U
:dd.Uncatalog a data set. The following responses are possible&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Uncataloged:ehp2.. The data set has been successfully
uncataloged
:li.:hp2.Data set not in catalog:ehp2.
:li.:hp2.VSAM data set:ehp2.. A VSAM component cannot be uncataloged.
:li.:hp2.Error uncatalog processing:ehp2.. The uncatalog
function had abended for some reason.
:eul.
:dt.V
:dd.Display the data set, EDIT will be invoked in VIEW mode.
See .hdref refid=edit for more information about EDIT/VIEW.
for more information concerning browse. The following responses
The following responses can appear&colon
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Viewed:ehp2., successful display
:li.:hp2.Access denied:ehp2.. No permission (RACF) to access.
:li.:hp2.No temporary data set:ehp2., RPFVTC1 is not allococated
in RPFINIT. VTOC is unable to save the workspace. This error is
already detected upon start of RPF with the message
:hp2.'Init error Rc=0024':ehp2.
:li.:hp2.Edit/View not available:ehp2..
The specified data set has not a RECFM of FB or VB or does
contain a record length longer than 255 bytes.
:li.:hp2.Error in Browse/View:ehp2.. The data set cannot be viewed due
to an error.
:eul.
:dt.Z
:dd.Compress the data set. IEBCOPY will be invoked to perform this
function. The following responses are possible&colon.
:ul c.
:li.:hp2.Compressed:ehp2.. The data set has been successfully
compressed.
:li.:hp2.Error during compress:hp2.. IEBCOPY suffers an unsuccessful
return code.
:li.:hp2.Access denied:ehp2.. No permission (RACF) to access.
:li.:hp2.DYNALLOC error:ehp2.. One or more workdata sets of IEBCOPY
cannot be allocated. This can be caused by an abend of a previous
RPF session or space problems on dasd.
:li.:hp2.Compress not available:ehp2.. The data set is not a PDS
or you are trying to compress SYS1.LINKLIB.
:li.:hp2.IEBCOPY not APF authorized:ehp2.. RPF runs not APF
authorized.
:eul.
If the line command is not 'A', 'B', 'C', 'D', 'E', 'M', 'I', 'R', 'S',
'U', 'V', 'Z' or blank the message:
:hp2.'Select A,B,C,D,E,I,M,R,S,U,V,Z':ehp2. will be set in the comments
field for that data set.
:edl.
:p.
:hp2.Option 2:ehp2.
.br
:p.The information is loaded in the EDIT workspace and the data sets
are sorted in alphabetical order.
The first 3 lines displayed are header lines.
This 1st line shows the name of the volume, the julian date and
time, the used parm ('SHORT' or 'LONG') and the VTOC type
(VTOC=IX for indexed or VTOC=OS for a standard VTOC).
The second header line will give you the VTOC boundaries
The VTOC indicators (DS4VTOCI, see debugging handbook),
The number of directory blocks and the number of DSCBs on
a track.
The third line contains the number of tracks/cylinder, the
lenght of the track in bytes and the total number of cylinders on
the volume.
The last line of the workspace describes the empty space on the
volume.
:p
The VTOC function of RPF supports the new indexed VTOC structure
too. (data facilities/device support df/ds)
If a volume with an indexed VTOC is taken the following extra
information will be displayed:
:ul c.
:li.The total number of free VTOC index records (VIRS).
:li.'VTOC=IX' in the header line.
:eul.
For the displayed data sets the following information is displayed:
:ol c.
:li.The DSNAME. (the first 26 positions if PARM=SHORT/VOL or
blanks if PARM=LONG)
:li.The creation date or the volume if PARM=VOL is used
:li.The last reference date.
:li.The data set organization.
:li.The record format.
:li.The logical record length.
:li.The block length.
:li.The number of extents of the data set (max 123).
:li.The allocated space in tracks.
:li.The free tracks inside the data set.
:eol.
If the volume for which you requested a VTOC listing is not mounted
the message 'Volume not available' appears in the message area
and the data entry screen will be displayed with retry possibility.
.br
If you terminate EDIT with END, the VTOC menu re-appears.
.sp
:hp2.Option V:ehp2.
.br
This option displays five summary lines on the VTOC menu. These
lines contains VTOC and volume information and a summary
of the free space on the volume.
After execution, the VTOC menu re-appears.
:h3.LIBRARIAN maintenance.
:p.
If you select '5' on the RPF utility or '3.5' on the RPF main
menu, a data entry screen for the desired LIBRARIAN master file
will be displayed.
.br
You can change the 'Master file' and 'Volume serial'  fields.
Press ENTER to perform the allocation.
If option '1' has been entered, the data set should be a disk master
file. With option '2' a tape master file should be specified.
If the allocation is not successful an error message will be displayed
in the message area. You can type in '1' or '2'
and alter the fields or press PF03/PF15 to leave the allocation
menu.
:p.
After successful allocation RPF goes to the LIBRARIAN maintenance
screen.
The screen is divided into 5 parts:
:ol c.
:li.The header line.
:li.The message area.
:li.The command area for the commands.
:li.The LIBRARIAN description field.
:li.The LIBRARIAN module area.
:eol.
Each line of the module area contains the following fields:
:ul.
:li.The operation. This is an input field.
The codes are:
:ol c.
:li.'B', BROWSE the module.
:li.'D', Delete the module.
:li.'E', EDIT the module.
:li.'P', Print the module to the default SYSOUT class.
:eol.
:li.The module name. This field is protected.
:li.The description of the module. This field is protected field.
:li.The programmer's name field, which contains the name
of the creator of that module, or an response of a line
command entered in field 1.
If it is an response of a line command, this field will
be highlighted.
.br
The response can be:
:ol c.
:li.*Browsed  successful display.
:li.*Copied  successful copy.
:li.*Deleted  successful delete.
:li.*EDIT N/A  module not EDIT due to init error rc= 0024.
:li.*COPY N/A  module not copied due to init error rc= 0024.
:li.*Edited  successful EDIT.
:li.*Printed  successful print.
:li.*Not-Browsed module deleted by previous DELETE.
:li.*Not-Copied module deleted by previous DELETE or SAVE menu
exited.
:li.*Not-del  delete overruled by user.
:li.*Not-Edit  module deleted by previous DELETE.
:li.*WS too small  The EDIT workspace is too small. Increase in
RPF option 0.1.
:li.*NOT-PRT  module deleted by previous DELETE.
:li.*Sel B,D,E or P Wrong command entered.
:eol.
:eul.
The RPF LIBRARIAN maintenance commands are:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display the last screen of the directory listing.
An alias of BOTTOM is B.
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Scroll 1 page forward.
.br
:dt.END or RETURN
:dd.Terminate LIBRARIAN maintenance. RPF will go back to
the utility menu with 'END' or main menu with
the 'return' command
:dt.INDEX
:dd.Edit the LIBRARIAN index. The RPF editor will be
invoked.
:dt.L 'string'
:dd.Locate member 'string' or member name, that start
with 'string' (specify 1-8 characters in the
'string' operand).
After successful execution of the command, LIBRARIAN
maintenance will display the screen, within the
first line the LIBRARIAN module, where the first
occurrence of 'string' was found (highlighted).  If
no match can be found the next module, which contains
the text next higher than the to be located string
will be the first line on the screen.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen. You can alter here your PFK
settings. To terminate the PFK screen enter 'END'.
:lblbox.Note
The changed PFK settings are only valid
during this RPF session. To change the PFKs in the RPF profile
data set, select the defaults menu. (0 on the main menu)
:elblbox.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the directory listing.
An alias of TOP is T.
:dt.UP
:dd.Scroll 1 page backward.
.br
If you are on the first screen the message
:edl.
:h3 id=outp. The RPF output processor.
The RPF output processor is available if you select '6' on the
utility menu or '3.6' on the main menu. The output panel contains
the following fields&colon.
:ul c.
:li.The option field
:li.The selection possibilities
:li.The jobname to be entered
:li.The JES2 job-id to be entered
:li.The output class
:li.The status area
:eul.
You can specify the following options&colon.
:ul c.
:li.L, display the job status. The status of the specified jobname
will be displayed in the status area. If you specify only the
user id (default), all the jobs starting with 'userid' + 1
jobname character will be displayed. If usermod ZP60016 has been
applied in MVS38J, all the jobs starting with 'userid' + 1, 2 or 3
jobname characters will be displayed. The status of the specified
jobname(s) will be displayed in the status area.
:li.D, delete the held output from Spool.
:li.R, requeue the output to another output class. Specify a new
output class in the appropriate field.
:li.P, print the output into a data set with the name
'userid.RPFOUT.Dyyddd.Thhmmss.OUTLIST'. This data set will be
allocated with RECFM=VB,LRECL=255,BLKSIZE=6100 and cataloged.
You can process this data set afterwards.
:li.<blank>, display the output of the job. All the HELD output data sets
of the job will be read from the JES2 Spool and the BROWSE processor
will be invoked. See :hdref refid=brw for more information
concerning BROWSE.
:li.PF03/PF15, terminate the output processor and go to the utility
menu.
:eul.
:p.
If one or more errors occurs, a suitable message will be displayed
with retry possibility.
:h3 id=search. The RPF search processor.
The SEARCH function is available, if you select '8' on the
utility menu or '3.8' on the main menu.
.br
A data entry screen will be displayed to select a sequential
or a partitioned data set. In this menu also a
search string should be specified and the 'Skip numbers'
and 'Ignore case' options are present.
This entry menu is like the EDIT menu.
The data set should have a record format of fixed or variable
records with record length with a maximum of 255.
.br
If 'Skip numbers' = 'Y' the last 8 bytes of the records of
fixed data will be excluded for SEARCH or the first 8 bytes
of variable data will be excluded for SEARCH.
.br
If 'Skip numbers' = 'C' the last 8 bytes, and the first 6
bytes of card image fixed data will be excluded for SEARCH.
If not fixed and/or card image the value 'Y' is assumed.
.br
If 'Skip numbers' = 'N' the entire record will be searched.
.br
If 'Ignore case' = 'Y' the string will be matched not matter
if the data is upper-, lower- or mixed case.
.br
If 'Ignore case' = 'N' the string should exactly match.
:p.
If '=n(.n)' is entered in the data set name,
RPF returns to the main menu and executes option n(.n).
.br
After successful allocation, the data set will be scanned for the
specified string. After the scan the output will be browsed.
See :hdref refid=brw for more information about RPF Browse.
:h3.ARCHIVER maintenance.
:p.
If you select '9' on the RPF utility or '3.9' on the RPF main
menu, a data entry screen for the desired ARCHIVER VSAM cluster
will be displayed.
.br
ARCHIVER is a free component, written by Rick Fochtman and
available on www.cbttape.org in file 147. With Archiver you
can archive data sets and members in one VSAM cluster, called
'the Archive'. Members in the Archive are called 'items'.
.br
In the data entry screen, you specify the data set name of
of ARCHIVER VSAM cluster and filters for ITEMS, GROUPS, SUBGROUPS
and ITEMS. If these filter fields are blank, all items in the
ARCHIVE cluster are selected.
.br
The field 'Confirm item delete' can be set to '/' or <blank> to
unconditionally delete the ITEM or not.
:p.
In the filter fields, you can use wildcards '*' for 1 or more
characters and/or '%' for a single character.
:p.
Example: select the items starting with ABC of group SOURCE with
subgroup V2R1M1 and V2R1M2 and type ASM.
:xmp.
- Item         = ABC*
- Group        = SOURCE
- Subgroup     = V2R1M%
- Type         = ASM
:exmp.
:p.
After successful allocation an ARCHIVER item selection list is
displayed.
The screen is divided into 4 parts:
:ol c.
:li.The header line.
:li.The message area.
:li.The command area for the commands.
:li.A list or ARCHIVER items.
:eol.
Each line of the module area contains the following fields:
:ul.
:li.The operation. This is an input field.
The codes are:
:ol c.
:li.'B', Browse the item.
:li.'D', Delete the item. The RPF browser will be invoked
to view the output. If the attribute 'Confirm item delete' is
set to '/', a confirmation screen will be displayed. With value
<blank>, the item will be deleted unconditionally.
:li.'E', EDIT the item.
:li.'N', Browse the NOTES of an Archiver item if present.
Check the '*' after the VERSION.
:li.'P', Print the item to the default SYSOUT class.
:li.'R', Rename the item with the Archiver ALTER function.
:li.'V', View the item.
:eol.
:li.The item name, version, '*' or 'A', Group, Subgroup, Type,
DSORG- RECFM- LRECL and BLKSIZE of the original data set and
the number of records.
.br
If an '*' is present after the version, the ITEM contains notes,
which can be listed with the line command 'N'.
.br
If an 'A' is present after the version, this ITEM is an alias.
The true name, true name GROUP, true name SUBGROUP, true name TYPE
and true name VERSION are displayed instead of the date and DCB info.
The alias is not selectable for line commands.
:li.The creation date of the item or a message.
.br
The message can contain the following&colon
:ol c.
:li.Browse error, error in browse processing.
:li.Browsed, successful display.
:li.Deleted, successful delete.
:li.EDIT N/A, module not EDITed, because the RECFM is not Fixed,
Variable or has a LRECL > 255.
:li.Edited, successful EDIT.
:li.NOTES listed, successful browse of the item notes.
:li.Printed, successful print.
:li.Renamed, successful ALTER.
:li.Alloc error, an error occurs during delete or NOTES processing.
:li.Not deleted, PF03/PF15 pressed on confirm screen.
:li.Not renamed, PF03/PF15 pressed on RENAME screen.
:li.No NOTES, The item does not contain NOTES data.
:li.Rename error, Allocation Archiver data sets failed.
:li.Invalid sel., invalid line command entered.
:li.Truncated, EDIT workspace too small.
:li.View N/A, module not viewed, because the RECFM is not Fixed,
Variable or has a LRECL > 255.
:li.Viewed, successful VIEW.
:eol.
:eul.
The RPF ARCHIVER maintenance commands are:
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Primary command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.BOTTOM
:dd.Display the last screen of the directory listing.
An alias of 'BOTTOM' is 'B'.
:dt.DOWN
:dd.Scroll 1 page forward.
:dt.END or RETURN
:dd.Terminate ARCHIVER maintenance.
:dt.L 'string'
:dd.Locate item 'string' or item name, that start
with 'string' (specify 1-8 characters in the
'string' operand). If found, the item will be the
first line of the item list.
:dt.LEFT
:dd.Scroll to the left part of the screen on narrow screens.
:dt.PFK
:dd.Display PFK screen. You can alter here your PFK
settings. To terminate the PFK screen enter 'END'.
:lblbox.Note
The changed PFK settings are only valid
during this RPF session. To change the PFKs in the RPF profile
data set, select the defaults menu. (0 on the main menu)
:elblbox.
:dt.REFRESH
:dd.Read again the archive and re-populate the screen with the
Archiver items.
:dt.RIGHT
:dd.Scroll to the right part of the screen on narrow screens.
:dt.TOP
:dd.Start display with the top of the item listing. An alias of
'TOP' is 'T'
:dt.UP
:dd.Scroll 1 page backward.
:edl.
:h2.Foreground assembler and linkage editor.
:p.
If you enter '4' on the RPF main menu, you get the assembler panel.
This screen contains many fields, which are described below:
:dl tsize=25
:dt.The Sourcelib field.
:dd.In this field, the member name and library name should be
specified. The data set should be cataloged. Leave member name
blank if the data set is sequential.
:dt.The OBJECT lib field.
:dd.In this field, the member name and library of a object card
image library should be specified. If the member name is omitted,
the member name of the source lib will be used.
If the library is omitted, a temporary data set will be allocated
if assembly is selected, or no data set will be allocated if
assembly is not selected.
:dt.The LOAD lib field.
:dd.In this field, the member name and library of a load library
should be specified. If the member name is omitted, the member name
of the object library will be used.
By default this field contains the name of the source library.
Only the last qualifier of the data set name is changed into 'LOAD'.
:dt.The INCLUDE library field.
:dd.This field gives you the possibility to specify a DDNAME and
a DSNAME of an extra OBJECT or LOAD library to perform extra
inclusions of OBJECT or LOAD modules during link edit.
Both DDNAME and DSNAME should be specified to perform the
allocation of this data set.
The INCLUDE of the OBJECT or LOAD modules can be done by using
the control statement fields.
:dt.The MACLIB fields.
:dd.This field contains 6 fields for maclibs to be allocated
to the assembler. The defaults are the 'SYS1.MACLIB' for the
1st field, the 'SYS1.AMODGEN' for the 2nd field, and the
data set entered in the allocation menu in the 5th field, if
the data set is partitioned.
If one or more maclib fields are blank, the field will be
skipped.
.br
Ex. if 1st maclib is specified, 2nd maclib is blank and 3rd
maclib is specified, 2nd maclib will be skipped and 3rd maclib
becomes 2nd maclib.
:dt.The assembler field.
:dd.You can specify here 'Y' or 'N' to assemble your source or not.
Default is 'Y'.
:dt.The assembler output field.
:dd.This field contains 'Y',  or 'N'. Default is 'N'
If you specify 'Y' the SYSPRINT comes on the screen after
assembly (and link).
.br
With 'N' no browse will be invoked, except if the assembler has
given a nonzero returncode. Then the SYSTERM output will be browsed.
:dt.The additional assembler parm field.
:dd.The default is blanks. You can specify here the the additional
parameters for the assembler. The parameters 'NODECK', 'LOAD'
and 'LINECOUNT(51)' are already specified.
:dt.The linkage editor field.
:dd.You can specify here 'Y' or 'N' to link edit  your assembler
object deck or not. Default is 'Y'.
:dt.The linkage editor parm field.
:dd.You can specify here the linkage editor parm.
default is 'LIST,XREF,NCAL'.
:dt.The Linkage Editor output field
:dd.Select 'Y' or 'N' to BROWSE the linkage editor output after
BROWSE of the assembler output. Default is 'N' if the linkage editor
has a return code of 0 and 'Y' if the link has a return
code not equal 0.
:dt.The loadmodule field.
:dd.This member name is the name of the loadmodule created by
the linkage editor. If this member name is omitted the
member name of the object library is used.
:dt.The printer name
:dd.Specify here the name of the remote printer, which will receive
the output if a "PRINT" primary command has been entered. If no
printer specified, the output will be locally printed.
:dt.The output class
:dd.Specify here the output class for the listing.
:dt.The control statement fields.
:dd.In these fields you can specify max 6 control statements
for the linkage editor.
:edl.
If you hit ENTER after changing the fields all the data sets will
be allocated. After successful allocation of the all the assembler
files the assembler will be invoked. The name of the assembler is
the name specified in the defaults menu. The start of the
assembler will be indicated to the user with the message
'nnnnnnnn running.' in the message area of the screen (nnnnnnnn =
the name of the assembler)
.sp
If the return code is 4 or below, the linkage editor will be invoked
(only if linkage editor=Y is selected on the screen).
The start of the linkage editor will be indicated to the user by means
of the message 'IEWL     running...' in the message area.
:p.
If the assembler has ended with a return code higher than 4 the
message 'RC ASM=xx' will appear and the linkage editor will
not be executed.
:p.
If the assembler and/or linkage editor has ended, the message
'(RC ASM=xx,) (RC LKED=xx)' will be displayed on the screen.
You can change now only the assembler output field on the screen.
press ENTER to go to the output screen.
.br
The output screen is the BROWSE screen, see :hdref refid=brw for more
detailed information concerning BROWSE.
:p.
After completion of browse of the output of assembler end/or
linkage editor, the assembler menu will reappear.
:lblbox.Note
You can escape from the assembler screen with the command 'END'
or the PFKs 3 or 15.
RPF will go back to the main menu.
:elblbox.
:h2 id=tso. RPF TSO command processor.
:p.
If you select function '6' on the RPF main menu the RPF
TSO command processor will be attached.
The TSO command processor screen contains an input field
of 156 characters to type in the TSO command.
With 'END' in the input field (or PF03/PF15),
RPF returns to the main menu. Also the command '=n' or '=n.n' will
terminate TSO and the option 'n' or 'n.n' will be executed from
the RPF main menu.
Almost each TSO command can be executed. RPF starts the output
in line 10 on the screen and can be continued on the next
screens. If the TSO command is completed, RPF displays the
message 'RPF TSO: READY' together with three asterisks ('***').
press ENTER to review the command processor screen with the last
entered command.
.br
The last 10 TSO commands will be saved in the screen from row 10
until row 19. To repeat a saved command, place the cursor on any
place in the command and hit 'Enter'. The command will be
placed in the input area. You can alter this command before
execution.
After finishing RPF, the last 10 commands will be saved in the
RPF profile data set with member name @RPFTSO.
:p.
If a command does not exist or it is not recommended to do that
(like LOGON,LOGOFF and RPF) RPF TSO will come back with the
message 'Command is not supported'
:h2 id=help. The RPF HELP facility.
:p.
If you select '7', press PF01 or PF13 on the RPF main menu,
or the HELP command in EDIT, the HELP menu will be displayed.
On the HELP menu you can select the following options:
:sl.
:li.1. The RPF introduction.
The introduction contains a short description of how RPF works.
:li.2. The RPF commands.
These screens contain a short description of the RPF commands.
:li.3. The RPF return codes.
These screens contain an explanation of the return codes, that
are displayed in some RPF messages.
:li.4. The RPF messages:
These screens contain all the RPF messages.
:li.5. The RPF Release notes.
These screens contain the latest improvements made by the
RPF developers.
:li.X. Terminate the RPF HELP menu.
RPF will go back to the main menu.
:esl.
It is also possible to select the HELP functions directly from
the RPF main menu, without interference of the HELP menu (e.g.
select '7.5' for HELP-Release notes). If the function is terminated
in this case, RPF always returns to the main menu.
:p.
Primary commands in the HELP panels.
:p.
For the primary commands of the HELP panels see :hdref refid=brw
:p.
RPF also have 2 TSO HELP members, named RPF and RPFED. These
members belong in a HELP data set specified in the //SYSHELP
DD-statement in your TSO logon procedure. These members give
a brief description about RPF and the stand-alone TSO
command processor RPFED. The members RPFHELP1, RPFHELP2,
RPFHELP3, RPFHELP4 and RPFHELP should also be present in one
of the libraries in the //SYSHELP concatenation.
:h2.The RPF TEST mode.
:p.
The TEST mode is not intended for the normal RPF users. It is an
authorized function for the RPF developers.
If you enter '8' on the RPF main menu, the user must supply a
password.
:p.
If you enter five wrong passwords, RPF will go back to the main
menu.
:p.
If the password is correct, the RPF test menu will be displayed.
you can select the following numbers.
:sl.
:li.1. Display the session status. Press ENTER to go back to the main
menu.
:li.2. The operator mode
:li.3. Display the RPF control blocks and entry points.
The entry points can be reloaded with the RELOAD 'modname' command.
:li.4. Attach a program to be tested.
:li.5. Display the RPF internal return codes.
:li.X. (or PF03 or PF15) Terminate the RPF test menu.
:esl.
:h2.The RPF operator mode.
:p.
To enter the RPF operator mode you should enter '9' on the
RPF main menu.
The operator mode is in non fullscreen mode.
The operator mode is announced with a header line
and the message 'RPFOPER: Enter function, 'HELP' or 'END'',
which is displayed upon entry of RPFOPER or if the 'K' command
has been given.
The following commands are available.
:dl tsize=18
:dthd.Command
:ddhd.Function
:dt.A=ALL
:dd.Display all the executing tasks in the system.
(batch, time sharing users, initiators and started tasks)
Each line contains: the taskname, the address space
number in hex, the type (JOB, STC or TSU),
.br
'N-TIMING' if no SMF timing is used, the
dispatching priority, and 'Swapped out' if the task is swapped out.
:dt.A=JOB
:dd.Display only the batch jobs in the system.
:dt.A=STC
:dd.Display only the started tasks and the inactive
initiators in the system.
:dt.A=TSU
:dd.Display only the time-sharing users in the system.
:dt.A=nnnn
:dd.Display address space id nnnn. Leading zeroes may be omitted.
:dt.J=ALL
:dd.Display all the tasks in the system, except the
inactive initiators.
:dt.J=jobname
:dd.Display job 'jobname' in the system.
:dt.D VOL=vvvvvv
:dd.Display the UCB of volume=vvvvvv the display of the
UCB contains the following information:
:ul c.
:li.The address where the UCB is found.
:li.The type of the UCB (DASD, COMM DEV, DISPLAY,
TAPE, UNIT REC or UNKNOWN)
:li.The first 48 bytes of the UCB in hex.
:li.'ONLINE' or 'OFFLINE'
:li.The unit address of that volume
:li.The volume serial number if available.
:eul.
:dt.D UCB=ddd or dddd
:dd.Display the UCB of device ddd or device dddd. This display
contains the same information as the 'D VOL=vvvvvv' command.
:dt.K
:dd.Clear the screen. A header line will be displayed.
:dt.HELP
:dd.Display the commands of RPF oper.
:dt.END or E
:dd.Terminate RPF operator mode.
The message 'RPF OPER, All functions completed' will
be displayed together with three asterisks ('***')
press ENTER to return to the RPF main menu.
:edl.
:p.
Messages of the RPF operator mode.
:ol.
:li.RPF OPER: A=nnnn,     - Not found on the ASCB chain
.br
Invalid address space id entered in 'A=nnnn' command.
:li.RPF OPER: J=jjjjjjjj, - Not found on the ASCB chain
.br
Jobname jjjjjjjj not found in the system.
:li.RPF OPER: UCB not found
.br
Volume in 'D VOL' or device address in 'D UCB' command not found
in the system.
:li.RPF OPER: Invalid command entered
.br
Not one of the above commands entered.
:eol.
:p.
RPFOPER can be run as a command on the native TSO terminal (the
READY prompt).  Enter the command RPFOPER to run this command.
:h2.TSO command processor RPFED
:p.
In native TSO, the TSO command processor RPFED is available.
You can use the TSO command RPFED to edit a data set or
member, RPFBR to browse a data set or member, RPFPD
to invoke Library Functions or RPFST to perform RESET ISPF stats
function.
:p.
Syntax:
:xmp.
RPFED data setname VOLUME(vvvvvv) LINES(nnnnn)
RPFBR data setname VOLUME(vvvvvv) LINES(nnnnn)
RPFPD data setname VOLUME(vvvvvv) LINES(nnnnn)
RPFST data setname VOLUME(vvvvvv) LINES(nnnnn) +
      NEWUSER(new userid) VERSION(nnnn)
:exmp.
:p.
The VOLUME keyword is optional and can be used if the 'data setname'
is not cataloged.
:p.
The LINES keyword specified the maximum lines to process
and should be a value between 200 and 50,000. The default is
7,000 lines.
.br
If RPFED/RPFBR/RPFPD and RPFST runs in addressing mode 31, the number
of lines will be automatically multiplied by 10.
:p.
The NEWUSER and VERSION keywords are optional and only used if
the RPFST (Reset ISPF stats) command verb is used.
The default value for NEWUSER is your TSO userid. The default for
VERSION = 0100 (ISPF vv + ISPF mm).
:p.
RPFED will invoke the RPF editor or the Edit member selection list.
.br
RPFBR will invoke the RPF browser or the Browse member selection list.
.br
RPFPD will invoke RPF Library Functions. If using RPFPD,
'data setname' should be a partitioned data set.
.br
RPFST executes the RESET ISPF stats function.
'data set name' should be a partitioned data set.
:p.
The normal TSO rules are in effect. If omitting the data
set name, the command processor will prompt you for the
data set. If you put the data set name between apostrophes,
the data set is treated as fully qualified. If no
apostrophes are used, the data set name will be prefixed with
your user id.
:p.
See :hdref refid=edit for a description of the editor and the
Edit member selection list or :hdref refid=brw for a description
of the browse and the Browse member selection list or
:hdref refid=reset for a description of the RESET function,
or :hdref refid=pdsm for a description of the PDS functions.
:h2.TSO command processor RPFV
:p.
In native TSO, the TSO command processor RPFV is available.
You can use the TSO command RPFV to create an RPF data set
list (RPF 3.4).
Syntax:
:xmp.
RPFV { PREFIX(dsn-prefix) | PREFIX(NONE) VOLUME(volser)
       LINES(nnnnn) }
:exmp.
:p.
Default for PREFIX is the userid. Default for VOLUME = blanks.
The PREFIX is a fuzzy prefix. Prefixes like 'SYS1' or
or 'SYS1.L' are both valid
:p.
If the volume serial is specified, only the data sets with this
prefix are selected.
.br
If PREFIX(NONE) is specified, a volume serial is required to
create a data set list of all data sets of that volume.
:p.
The LINES keyword specified the maximum lines to process
and should be a value between 200 and 50,000. The default is
7,000 lines.
.br
If RPFV runs in addressing mode 31, the number
of lines will be automatically multiplied by 10.
:p.
See :hdref refid=vtc (option 1) for more
information about the DSLIST function.
:h2.RPF messages.
:h3.messages of the RPF main processor.
:msgl compact.
:msg.(C) 1979-2025 Skybird
:sysact.None.
:presp.None, successful sign on to RPF.
:msg.//ISPPROF not found
:sysact.RPF choose her own defaults.
:presp.Specify an ISPPROF DD-statement in the TSO logon procedure
or allocate the profile data set with the ALLOCATE command.
:msg.Data set/member in use
:sysact.EDIT canceled, return to main menu.
:presp.This will happen if the data set and member
is edited or being save by another TSO
user with RPF or the IBM product SPF.
Wait for availability of the member or EDIT another member.
:msg.Data set/member saved
:sysact.None
:presp.None
:msg.I/O error
:sysact.EDIT or Browse terminated. Mainmenu displayed.
:presp.Examine the involved data set or select another data set.
:msg.Init. error rc= xxxx
:sysact.Session defaults not retrieved from the
RPF profile data set (except rc=24).
:presp.
:ul c.
:li.If rc=04, the profile data set cannot be opened.
Contact RPF support.
:li.If rc=12, RPF was unable to allocate a
temporary data set under DDNAME=RPFEDT1, RPFCTPST and/or RPFVTC1.
.br
The following actions can be tried:
:ol.
:li.Stop RPF, free RPFEDT1 and RPFVTC1 with the TSO
command 'FREE' and restart RPF.
:li.Accept the error but the EDIT
function of Library Functions and LIBRARIAN
maintenance and the EDIT, BROWSE en Member List functions in VTOC
are not available.
:li.If no solution can be found, contact RPF support.
:eol.
:li.If rc=16, the EDIT workspace cannot be GETMAIN'ed. Increase
the REGION size of the TSO session.
:eul.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select function 0-9 or X.
:msg.No workspace available
:sysact.EDIT workspace NOT getmained.
:presp.Relogon your TSO session with a larger region size or
decrease your workspace size.
See :hdref refid=def for more information.
:msg.Not saved: RC= xxxx
:sysact.The profile member is not updated.
.br
If rc=4, open error on the profile data set, try to
select the defaults menu several times,
If you have no success, contact RPF support.
.br
If rc=8, one of the members in the profile data set were not found.
Restart RPF. The members will be created.
.br
If rc=20, error caused by initialization error.
See the initialization error message.
If rc=24, the EDIT workspace cannot be FREEMAIN'ed.
:msg.RPFUSER1 not found
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Your installation does not supply a RPFUSER1
exit. you have 2 possibilities:
.br
1. Ignore the error
.br
2. Write a RPFUSER1 exit
:msg.Save canceled by user
:sysact.None
:presp.PF03/PF15 pressed on SAVE menu or CANCEL primary command
given in EDIT.
:msg.Workspace full
:sysact.EDIT function terminated.
:presp.SAVE your workspace and increase the size.
:msg.Workspace too small
:sysact.None.
:presp:Increase the workspace size or EDIT another data set.
:emsgl.
:h3.RPF session default messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.AUTOSAVE not Y or N
:sysact.AUTOSAVE value ignored.
:presp.Specify the correct value.
:msg.COLS not Y or N
:sysact.COLS value ignored.
:presp.Specify the correct value.
:msg.CAPS not AUT, ON or OFF
:sysact.CAPS value ignored.
:presp.Specify the correct value.
:msg.Confirm not ' ' or /
:sysact.Confirm value ignored.
:presp.Specify the correct value.
:msg.FREEMAIN failed, stop
:sysact.Workspace not freemained.
:presp.Severe error. Sign off and contact RPF support.
:msg.GETMAIN failed, retry
:sysact.Workspace not allocated. RPF will not leave
the defaults menu.
:presp.Decrease the size of the workspace.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select the right number on the menu.
:msg.Invalid SYSOUT class
:sysact.SYSOUT class ingnored.
:presp.Enter SYSOUT class A-Z or 0-9.
:msg.Invalid workspace size
:sysact.Workspace size ignored.
:presp.Enter a numeric number of lines with a
minimum of 500 and a maximum of 999,999.
:msg.No profile data set
:sysact.Defaults not saved.
:presp.The profile data set was not allocated to //ISPPROF.
:msg.NULLS/REPLACE not YES or NO
:sysact.Screen not exited.
:presp.Correct this value.
:msg.Upd. size destroys ws
:sysact.Current workspace no longer valid.
:presp.None.
:emsgl.
:h3.BROWSE messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Allocation error SYSOUT
:sysact.'PRINT' primary command terminated.
:presp.Severe error, contact RPF support.
:msg.Bottom of data reached
:sysact.F primary command executed, but no match found
:presp.Scroll to correct position, or re-enter
the F primary command with another string.
:msg.BROWSE substituted
:sysact.Browse is entered after trying to EDIT a RECFM=U data set.
:presp.None.
:msg.Chars ssssssssss found
:sysact.F primary command executed, All matches are highlighted.
:presp.None.
:msg.Invalid character string
:sysact.F primary command not executed.
:presp.Specify correct string
:msg.Invalid column number
:sysact.Column number is not numeric or exceeds
LRECL of data set. Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid column number in the 'C' command.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.Job jjjjjjjj submitted
:sysact.Contents of the data set submitted.
:presp.None
:msg.Listing made, SYSOUT=x
:sysact.SPIN OFF SYSOUT data set created.
:presp.None.
:msg.No JCL data set
:sysact.Submit not executed.
:presp.Browse a JCL data set with a LRECL of 80.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. the 'CON' attribute was not 'N', 'Y' or 'X'
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define the PFK or hit another PFK.
:msg.Submit failed
:sysact.TSO SUBMIT command failed.
:presp.Contact RPF support.
:msg.Truncated to LRECL=255
:sysact.Data sets with large records browsed but truncated.
:presp.None.
:emsgl.
:h3.EDIT messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.//* last update not found
:sysact.String '//* last update: ' not found in workspace.
:presp.Specify this string (without quotes) in the data.
:msg.Abendx37 in RPFSAVE
:sysact.EDIT workspace recovered and EDIT not left.
:presp.Save data in another data set with the CREATE or REPLACE
primary command.
:msg.APPEND not executed
:sysact.not executed, because workspace is too small.
:presp.Increase the workspace size with option 0.1
:msg.Boundary too small
:sysact.'F', 'C', or 'FILL' command ignored.
:presp.The character string in the command is
longer than the boundary range.
Use shorter character strings or reset
the boundary range with the 'BNDS' primary command.
:msg.Bottom of data reached
:sysact.'F' command is ignored.
:presp.Re-enter the 'F' or command with a valid character string.
:msg.Characters X'..' found
:sysact.FIND P'.' successful executed
:presp.None
:msg.Command not executed.
:sysact.'COBOL ON' primary command ignored.
:presp.The record format of the data set is variable or the record
length is not 80. Edit a card-image data set with fixed records.
:msg.Conflicting commands
:sysact.Primary and (pending) line commands ignored.
RPF will blank the command field and will
issue an implicit 'RESET' to reset the pending line-commands.
:presp.Do not enter line commands and primary
commands other than 'F' , 'L' or 'M' together or do no enter
conflicting line commands (like CC - CC - DD)
:msg.COPY terminated
:sysact.'CO' or 'MO' command ignored.
:presp.SAVE the workspace, increase the workspace
and re-EDIT the data set.
:msg.Data saved
:sysact.The workspace is successfully saved after the primary
command 'SAVE'.
:presp.None.
:msg.Data set created/repl
:sysact.The range of lines is successfully saved after the
primary command 'CREATE'.
:presp.None.
:msg.Data set is empty
:sysact.not executed, because appended data is empty.
:presp.APPEND another data set or member.
:msg.Data will be lost
:sysact.Message 'Renumber 'Yes' or 'No'' appears after pressing ENTER.
:presp.Enter 'Yes' or 'No' to renumber/not renumber.
:msg.Date/Time cannot be added
:sysact.No timestamp after '//* last update: ' added
:presp.Specify at least 12 bytes after this string to contain
the timestamp.
:msg.Delete failed
:sysact.'DEL' command ignored.
:presp.Do not delete more lines, than are present
from the start line till the end of the
workspace. If you want to delete till
the end of the workspace use '99999999'
in the second operand or use the line command 'DB'.
:msg.Enter "RETRY" or "END"
:sysact.This message appears after the
message 'Input convert failed'.
:presp.Execute the indicated action.
:msg.Enter SAVE, CANCEL or END
:sysact.The END primary command has been given with AUTOSAVE=N. Edit
will not terminate. SAVE will save the data, CANCEL stays in EDIT and
END will terminate EDIT without saving (after a warning message).
:presp.Execute indicated action or continue with EDIT.
:msg.I/O error
:sysact.APPEND not executed.
:presp.Unrecoverable error. Append a different data set or member.
:msg.Input convert failed
:sysact.Screen not displayed. message
'Enter "RETRY" or "END"' appears after pressing ENTER.
:presp.Enter 'RETRY' or 'END' and contact RPF support.
:msg.Input terminated
:sysact.'I' command ignored.
:presp.1. Input fewer lines or
2. Save the workspace, increase workspace and re-EDIT the data set.
:msg.Invalid boundaries
:sysact.BNDS primary command ignored, set to last correct value
:presp.Re-enter the command with right columns.
:msg.Invalid character string
:sysact.'C' ,'F' or 'FILL' command is ignored.
:presp.Re-enter the command with
a valid character string.
:msg.Invalid characters xlated
:sysact.Invalid characters xlated into periods.
:presp.none.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command or 'HELP' to list the commands.
:msg.Invalid COPY range
:sysact.'CO' or 'MO' command ignored.
:presp.Try to copy or move a line range into that
same range, enter a correct CO or MO command.
:msg.Invalid line number
:sysact.'L' command ignored.
:presp.Line number not numeric or line number not
:msg.Invalid scroll value
:sysact.Scroll field reset to last value.
:presp.The first character entered in the scroll
value was not a 'C', 'H', 'L' or a 'P'.
.br
No action is needed; RPF will reset the last correct value.
found in workspace. Enter the right line number.
:msg.Job jjjjjjjj submitted
:sysact.Workspace submitted.
:presp.None
:msg.Line x invalid
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a line number that exists in the workspace.
:msg.Line-x not found
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter the right line number in the command.
:msg.Lines not numeric
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.One or more lines were not numeric. Enter numeric lines.
:msg.No card image data set
:sysact.JCL or SUB(MIT) command ignored.
:presp.Use a data set or member with a record length of 80.
:msg.No clipboard file
:sysact.RPFCTPST was not allocated due to some reason.
:presp.Check empty space on disk volumes with use attribute
"storage" or "public" and restart RPF.
:msg.No JOB statement found
:sysact.Submit not executed.
:presp.Check the job statement, add this and re-submit.
:msg.Nothing to RETRIEVE
:sysact.No commands retrieved. Possible the first command entered
in the RPF session.
:presp.none.
:msg.Number of Lines invalid
:sysact.Screen changes and command ignored.
:presp.
Trying to insert more than 999,999 lines with
an 'I' or an 'R' primary command.
:msg.PASTE buffer too large
:sysact.Records of clipboard not pasted.
:presp.Increase workspace size (option 0.1) or paste the records
into another data set.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.The 'CON' attribute of the PFK is not
'N', 'Y' or 'X'. redefine that PFK.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define the PFK or hit another PFK.
:msg.Renumber 'Yes' or 'No'
:sysact.This message appears after the
message 'Data will be lost'.
:presp.Execute the indicated action.
:msg.Save rejected in VIEW
:sysact.SAVE command and END command with changes made not executed.
:presp.EDIT the data set or member with EDIT instead of VIEW or
use the primary commands CREATE or REPLACE to save the data.
:msg.SUBMIT failed
:sysact.Submit terminated.
:presp.Check if the 'JCL' attribute is present
in the TSO 'SYS1.UADS' data set.
If the JCL attribute is present, then it
is a severe error. Contact RPF support.
If the JCL attribute is not present, you are
not authorized to submit jobs. Contact
RPF support to add the JCL attribute.
:msg.Text not found
:sysact.'C' command is ignored.
:presp.Re-enter the 'C' or command with a valid character string.
:msg.Use CUT before PASTE
:sysact.The clipboard file is empty.
:presp.Use a CUT command to add records to the clipboard.
:msg.Workspace not numbered
:sysact.UNNUM primary command ignored.
:presp.Enter the 'RENUM' primary command first before clear the last
8 columns or columns 01-06 (COBOL mode) of the workspace
or ignore the message.
:msg.Workspace renumbered
:sysact.Successful execution of RENUMBER primary command.
:presp.None.
:msg.Workspace too small
:sysact.EDIT terminated. RPF returns in the data entry menu.
:presp.Increase workspace size with the defaults menu. (option 0.1).
:msg.xxxx changes made
:sysact.Successful 'C' command. User will be notified
of the number of changes made by RPF.
:presp.None.
:msg.xxxx lines filled
:sysact.'FILL' primary command executed successfully.
:presp.None.
:msg.xxxx Lines xlated
:sysact.'UC' or 'LC' primary command executed successfully.
:presp.None.
:msg.xxxx records cut
:sysact.RPF has xxxx records written to the clipboard file
:presp.None. Use PASTE to paste the clipboard in another data set or
member.
:msg.xxxx records pasted
:sysact.The clipboard has been successfully pasted.
:presp.None.
:emsgl.
:h3.EDIT hardcopy messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.ACB open err. xxxxxxxx
:sysact.Hardcopy aborted, 'ACB' cannot be opened.
:presp.Investigate the open error code and retry.
:msg.Alloc error xxxx PRINT
:sysact.Hardcopy: temporary data set not allocated,
refer to MVS Job management or z/OS MVS Programming:
Authorized Assembler Services for the error code.
:presp.Contact RPF support.
:msg.Copies invalid
:sysact.'HAR' command ignored.
:presp.Re-enter the command with a right copy number.
:msg.Copies not numeric
:sysact.'HAR' command ignored.
:presp.Re-enter the command with numeric copy number.
:msg.Hardcopy failed xxxx
:sysact.Hardcopy aborted, 'SEND', 'OPNDST' or 'INQUIRE'failed.
:presp.This can be a malfunction of the printer.
Investigate 'xxxx' (RC, FDBK2) and contact RPF support.
:msg.Hardcopy made
:sysact.Hardcopy executed successful.
:presp.None.
:msg.LU=xxxxxxxx invalid
:sysact.'HAR' command ignored
:presp.The printer-name specified do not exist
in the network. Specify another printer name.
:msg.Printer in use, retry
:sysact.Hardcopy aborted.
:presp.Someone else is using that printer. Wait
for completion or specify another printer.
:msg.VTAM cb error
:sysact.Hardcopy aborted.
:presp.Error caused 'GENCB' error. Contact RPF support.
:emsgl.
:h3.LIBRARIAN messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Alloc. error work DS
:sysact.LIBRARIAN write function has been aborted.
:presp.Press ENTER to return to the main
menu and contact RPF support.
:msg.Alloc. error xxxx on DS
:sysact.LIBRARIAN update: Function ignored retry screen displayed.
:presp.Refer to 'MVS/ESA Authorized Assembler Programming'
chapter 'Dynamic allocation services' to get an explanation of the
error code. Correct this error and retry.
:msg.Data set not in catalog
:sysact.LIBRARIAN update: Function ignored. Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify another master file or supply the volume.
:msg.Data set not on volume
:sysact.LIBRARIAN update: Function ignored. Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify another master file or volume.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.LIBRARIAN update: Function ignored.
:presp.Select function 1 or 2.
:msg.Specify Masterfile
:sysact.LIBRARIAN update: RPF waits for action.
:presp.Execute indicated action.
:msg.Userid not in table
:sysact.LIB update: Userid set in 'PGMR' field
instead of the name of the owner of the userid.
:presp.Contact RPF support to add an
entry in the userid/name table (RPFLIB02).
:emsgl.
:h3.Archiver update messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Alloc. error work DS
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.severe error, contact RPF support.
:msg.Alloc error xxxx
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Archive cluster cannot be allocated. Specify
another Archive cluster.
:msg.Data set not cataloged
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a cataloged Archive VSAM cluster.
:msg.Item name is required
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.enter a valid item (member) name.
:msg.Specify Archive
:sysact.Retry screen displayed
:presp.Specify an Archiver VSAM cluster.
:emsgl.
:h3.Messages of the RPF utility processor.
:msgl compact.
:msg.ARCHIVER not installed
:sysact.module ARCHIVER not found, retry menu displayed
:presp.Install ARCHIVER (file 147 on www.cbttape.org) or specify
another option.
:msg.I/O error
:sysact.Reset, PDS or SEARCH not executed.
:presp.Examine the involved data set or select another data set.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select function 1-9 or X.
:msg.Not APF Authorized
:sysact.Output processor not executed.
:presp.Authorize the library, where RPF resides.
:emsgl.
:h3.Reset ISPF/RPF messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Invalid ISPF mod level
:sysact.Retry RESET data entry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a value between 00 and 99 (always enter
2 numbers).
:msg.Invalid ISPF version
:sysact.Retry RESET data entry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a value between 01 and 99 (always enter
2 numbers).
:msg.Invalid new User ID
:sysact.Retry RESET data entry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a new user id with the syntax of a user id.
(starts with an alphabetic character or national character).
:msg.S=Reset,D=Delete stats
:sysact.None, informational message in option 3.0.
:presp.None.
:emsgl.
:h3.Library Functions messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.BROWSE substituted
:sysact.Selection list set in BROWSE mode if trying to EDIT a RECFM=U
partitioned data set.
:presp.None.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.Member not found
:sysact.'S member' command ignored
:presp.The member selection list is invoked from option 1 (Browse).
specify an existing member.
:msg.No string specified
:sysact.'L' command ignored.
:presp.Specify a string in the 'L' primary command.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. The 'CON' attribute of
the PFK must be 'N', 'Y' or 'X'.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define that PFK or press another PFK.
:msg.Truncate to xxxxx entries
:sysact.The first xxxxx members are in the member area.
:presp.Increase the size of the workspace
with the defaults menu and invoke the member selection
list again or accept this truncation.
:emsgl.
:h3.Data set functions messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Access denied
:sysact.Data set not created. Rejected by a security system like
RACF.
:presp.Use another data set name or created an access rule.
:msg.Allocation RC=xx Err=yyyy
:sysact.Data set creation terminated.
:presp.Refer for the code xxx to 'TSO Guide to writing a Terminal
Monitor Program or a Command Processor' chapter 'Using DAIR'.
Correct the error and retry.
:msg.Attribute list failed
:sysact.Data set not created.
:presp.Contact RPF support.
:msg.BLK not multiple of LRECL
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Correct LRECL or BLKSIZE. This will happen if RECFM=F(B/M/A/S).
:msg.BLKSIZE exceeds 32767
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Decrease BLKSIZE
:msg.BLKSIZE smaller than 18
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Increase BLKSIZE
:msg.Data set allocated
:sysact.Successful allocation of a new data set.
:presp.None.
:msg.Data set deleted
:sysact.Data set uncataloged and scratched.
:presp.None.
:msg.Data set not on DASD
:sysact.Data set not deleted.
:presp.Do not specify tape data sets.
:msg.Data set already exists
:sysact.Creation of data set ignored.
:presp.Spefify another data set name.
:msg.Data set not in catalog
:sysact.Data set not deleted.
:presp.Retry. Enter the right data set name.
:msg.Delete rejected
:sysact.Data set not deleted (PF03/PF15 entered on confirm screen)
:presp.None
:msg.Invalid LRECL
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Specify a numeric value
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select 'A' or 'D' on the retry menu.
:msg.Invalid BLKSIZE
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Specify a numeric value
:msg.Invalid RECFM
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Specify RECFM=F, FB, FBM, FBA, FBS, V, VB, VBM, VBA, VBS or U
:msg.LIBRARY not specified
:sysact.Data set creation ignored.
:presp.Enter a 'A' in the command area and
a library in the library area.
:msg.LRECL exceeds 32760
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Decrease LRECL.
:msg.LRECL exceeds BLKSIZE
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Correct LRECL or BLKSIZE
:msg.LRECL smaller than 18
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Increase LRECL
:msg.LRECL+4 exceeds BLKSIZE
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Correct LRECL or BLKSIZE. This will happen if RECFM=V(B/M/A)
:msg.PREFIX not specified
:sysact.Data set creation ignored.
:presp.Enter a 'A' in the command area and
a prefix in the prefix area.
:msg.SCRATCH error data set
:sysact.data set uncataloged, but not scratched.
:presp.SCRATCH data set with IEHPROGM.
:msg.Space not CYL/TRK/BLK
:sysact.Creation of data set ignored.
:presp.Re-specify space unit and retry.
:msg.Space value not numeric
:sysact.Data set creation ignored.
:presp.Change these fields and retry.
:msg.UNCATLG error data set
:emsgl.
:h3.Move/Copy messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.xxxxxxx blocks copied
:sysact.Sequential data set successfully copied.
:presp.None.
:msg.Access denied
:sysact.Cursor set in data set name in error.
:presp.Grant access or specify another data set.
:msg.Abend xxx detected
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed in case of a x37, 913 or B0A
abend. Press ENTER to leave the MOVE/COPY menu.
:presp.Compress the data set in case of a x37 abend, change the
authorization profiles in case of a 913 abend or authorize the RPF
load library in case of a B0A abend.
.br
Contact RPF support in case of another abend.
:msg.Conflicting DCB parms
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.The RECFM of both data sets should be the same. If RECFM = F(B)
or V(B), the LRECL should be the same. If RECFM=U, the BLKSIZE of the
TO data set should be equal or larger than the BLKSIZE of the FROM
data set.
:msg.Data set allocation error
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify a different data set name and/or volume for the
data set in error.
:msg.Data set name missing
:sysact.Data entry scree re-displayed.
:presp.Specify the data set (and volume) of both FROM and TO data sets.
:msg.Data set not in catalog
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify a volume or a correct data set name.
:msg.Data set not on volume
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify the right volume name or omit the volume if the
data set is cataloged.
:msg.Data set not PS or PO
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Both FROM and TO data sets should be partitioned or sequential
DSORG=PO or DSORG=PS).
Correct the data set name in error.
:msg.FROM and TO are the same
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify different data sets/volumes for FROM and TO data set.
:msg.I/O error input
:sysact.MOVE/COPY not executed.
:presp.Retry with another FROM data set.
:msg.IEBCOPY error
:sysact.Browse invoked to browse the SYSPRINT output of IEBCOPY and
allocation menu re-displayed afterwards.
:presp.IEBCOPY had a non-zero return code during copy of all members.
See the IEBCOPY output.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.No members in FROM data
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Do not specify empty partitioned data sets.
:msg.No string specified
:sysact.'L' command ignored.
:presp.Specify a string in the 'L' primary command.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. The 'CON' attribute of
the PFK must be 'N', 'Y' or 'X'.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define that PFK or press another PFK.
:msg.REPLACE not YES or NO
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed.
:presp.Correct this value
Specify a valid 'string'.
:msg.xxxxx members copied/moved
:sysact.Allocation menu re-displayed
:presp.None
:emsgl.
:h3.VTOC and data set list messages.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select function '1', '2' or 'V'.
:msg.Invalid PARM
:sysact.Retry screen displayed
:presp.Specify PARM=SHORT, LONG or VOL and re-enter.
:msg.No data sets found
:sysact.Retry screen displayed
:presp.No data sets found in the catalog with this level, specify
a different level.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. The 'CON' attribute of
the PFK must be 'N', 'Y' or 'X'.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define that PFK or press another PFK.
:msg.No string specified
:sysact.'L' command ignored.
:presp.Specify a string in the 'L' primary command.
:msg.Volume not available
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Specify an ONLINE volume.
:msg.Volume not specified
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Specify volume or exit (PF03/PF15)
:msg.VTOC running...
:sysact.The keyboard is locked and RPF is busy with
reading the VTOC
:presp.Wait for completion.
:emsgl.
:h3.LIBRARIAN maintenance messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Enter locate string
:sysact.RPF waits for indicated action.
:presp.Specify locate string (1 or more characters)
:msg.Error in read, CODE= x
:sysact.LIBRARIAN read aborted
:presp.Refer for code 'x' to the LIBRARIAN
documentation (LIB FAIR codes). Correct the error and retry.
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.Module not on master
:sysact.LIBRARIAN read: function ignored.
:presp.None.
:msg.Open error code= x
:sysact.LIBRARIAN maintenance aborted,
RPF will return to utility menu.
:presp.Refer for code 'x' to the LIBRARIAN
documentation (LIB FAIR codes). Correct the error and retry.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. The 'CON' attribute of
the PFK must be 'N', 'Y' or 'X'.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define that PFK or press another PFK.
:msg.Specify Masterfile
:sysact.RPF waits for action.
:presp.Specify a valid LIBRARIAN master file.
:emsgl.
:h3.SEARCH messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Alloc error xxxx PRINT
:sysact.SEARCH: temporary data set not allocated,
refer to MVS Job management or z/OS MVS Programming:
Authorized Assembler Services for the error code.
:presp.Contact the RPF builders.
:msg.Ignore case not Y or N
:sysact.waits for the correct response.
:presp.specify the correct value.
:msg.Open data set failed
:sysact.Severe error, contact the RPF builders.
:presp.Contact the RPF Builders.
:msg.Skip numbers not Y/C/N
:sysact.waits for the correct response.
:presp.specify the correct value.
:emsgl.
:h3.Archiver maintenance message
:msgl compact.
:msg.<ddname> alloc error.
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Look if <ddname> is already allocated onto the TSO session.
If allocated, use the FREE command to free that dd-name.
:msg.Confirm not ' ' or /
:sysact:Confirm value ignored.
:presp:Specify the correct value.
:msg.Data set not cataloged
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a cataloged Archive VSAM cluster
:msg.Enter locate string
:sysact.RPF waits for indicated action.
:presp.Specify locate string (1 or more characters).
:msg.Invalid command
:sysact.none, command ignored
:presp.Enter a valid command.
:msg.No items meet criteria
:sysact.data entry screen redisplayed.
:presp.Specify filters to meet the criteria.
:msg.PFK definition invalid
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Redefine that PFK. The 'CON' attribute of
the PFK must be 'N', 'Y' or 'X'.
:msg.PFK not defined
:sysact.PFK ignored.
:presp.Define that PFK or press another PFK.
:msg.Specify Archive
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify an Archiver VSAM cluster
:emsgl.
:h3.Assembler monitor messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Alloc. error work data
:sysact.Assembler screen exited.
:presp.Severe error. press ENTER to return to the
main menu and contact RPF support.
:msg.Allocation RC=xxxx
:sysact.Assembler redisplayed and cursor set in source lib field.
:presp.See chapter 12.13 the message 'Allocation
Failed RC= xxxx' for the returncode.
Re-enter the source lib and/or member depending on the returncode.
:msg.Data set name missing
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify an existing source library.
:msg.Data set not in catalog
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify an existing maclib, source library, include
library, object library or load library.
:msg.DS (x) SAME AS DS (y)
:sysact.RPF stops processing, sets cursor in the
DSNAME (y) field and waits for action.
:presp.Specify a different data set name.
:msg.DYNALLOC error SYSLIB
:sysact.SYSLIB concatenation not allocated.
:presp.Severe error. press ENTER to leave the
assembler screen and contact RPF support.
:msg.IEWL     running..
:sysact.RPF locks the keyboard and RPF has invoked
the linkage editor.
:presp.Wait for completion.
:msg.Invalid key pressed
:sysact.All input ignored.
:presp.Hit only the ENTER, PF03 or PF15 key
:msg.Member not found
:sysact.Assembler redisplayed and cursor set in source lib field.
:presp.Specify an existing member
:msg.nnnnnnnn abended ccc
:sysact.Assembler screen exited.
:presp.The assembler or linkage editor had abended. Press ENTER
to return to the main menu.
:msg.nnnnnnnn not found
:sysact.Assembler screen exited.
:presp.Press Enter and go to option 0.1 to specify a different
assembler program name.
:msg.nnnnnnnn running..
:sysact.RPF locks the keyboard and RPF has invoked
the assembler with program name 'nnnnnnnn'.
:presp.Wait for completion.
:msg.No card image data set
:sysact.Retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a source library with a record length of 80.
:msg.Rc ASM= xx (RC lkd= xx)
:sysact.assembler (and linkage editor) executed.
:presp.press ENTER to browse the output.
:msg. Rc=xx Err=xxxx on (x)
:sysact.RPF waits for response of the user
and set the cursor on the DSNAME in error (DSNAME (x))
:presp.Refer for the return code and error code to manual 'Writing
a terminal monitor program or a command processor'
.br
Change the dsname field '(x)' and press
ENTER or escape with the 'END' command.
:msg.Rc=xxxx Attribute lst
:sysact.Normally this should not occur. Assembler screen re-displayed.
:presp.Issue TSO command FREE FILE(ASMMACLB) to circumvent this
problem.
:emsgl.
:h3.TSO command processor messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Command name syntx err
:sysact.Input ignored (syntax error IKJSCAN).
:presp.Enter a right command name
:msg.Command not supported
:sysact.Command ignored.
:presp.This TSO command does not exist or is not
authorized. enter a valid command.
:msg.Invalid command name
:sysact.Input ignored (IKJSCAN)
:presp.Do not enter only TSO command separators
:msg.RPF-TSO: Abended completion code=xxx
:sysact.Abend detected in the TSO command processor,
recovery successful.
:presp.Contact RPF support (severe error).
:msg.RPF-TSO: ATTACH for processor failed
:sysact.Severe error. will be recovered.
:presp.Contact RPF support.
:msg.RPF-TSO: Command abended CC= xxx
:sysact.Abend detected in a TSO command,
recovery successful
:presp.If the code is severe (like 0Cx abends)
contact RPF support.
:msg.RPF-TSO: Command not found
:sysact.None, BLDL failed
:presp.Enter a valid TSO command
:msg.RPF-TSO: Interrupt received
:sysact.Recovered from 'ATTENTION' interrupt
:presp.Press ENTER to continue
:msg.RPF-TSO: Ready
:sysact.TSO command executed.
:presp.Press ENTER to continue.
:emsgl.
:h3.RPF HELP messages:
:msgl compact.
:msg.Alloc. error work data
:sysact.No HELP members displayed.
:presp.Severe error. Report this to RPF support.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Select function 0-9 or X.
:msg.No member RPFHELP. (. = 1,2,3,4,5)
:sysact.Function ignored.
:presp.Copy the members RPFHELP1, RPFHELP2, RPFHELP3, RPFHELP4 and
RPFHELP5 to an HELP library, which is present in the //SYSHELP
DD-statement in the TSO logon procedure, or concatenate the
RPF HELP library on the //SYSHELP DD-statement.
:emsgl.
:h3.Data entry, PFK and SAVE messages.
:msgl compact.
:msg.Abend ccc detected.
:sysact.abend caused by an OPEN abend. processing ignored.
:presp.Refer to the System Codes manual for an explanation
of the completion code 'ccc'.
:msg.Access denied.
:sysact.Function ignored on the retry screen.
:presp.specify another data set or create an access rule in
the security system.
:msg.Alloc failed, Rc= xxxx
:sysact.Entry screen and SAVE: retry screen displayed.
:presp.
:ul c.
:li.If rc=12, allocation error, possible errors
can be: 1. Data set allocated to another user
with DISP=OLD, MOD or NEW. 2. Invalid data set
name. 3. Required volume not mounted.
correct the problems and retry.
:li.If rc=16, the data set cannot be unallocated.
this is a severe error. contact RPF support.
:li.If rc=20, specify a data set with a record length of
255 or less and a RECFM of F(B) or V(B)
(edit, save and browse).
:li.If rc=28, enter a data set with DSORG=PS or PO.
:li.If rc=36, the authorization is failed, access has been
rejected by a security system like RACF.
:eul.
:msg.ARCHIVER not installed
:sysact.module ARCHIVER not found
:presp.Install ARCHIVER (file 147 on www.cbttape.org)
:msg.Confirm not ' ' or /
:sysact.Confirm value ignored.
:presp.Specify the correct value.
:msg.Data set name missing
:sysact.Data set entry and SAVE: retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify an existing data set (and volume).
:msg.Data set not in catalog
:sysact.Entry screen and SAVE: menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify a cataloged data set or specify a volume.
:msg.Data set not on volume
:sysact.Entry screen and SAVE: menu re-displayed.
:presp.Specify an existing data set.
:msg.Data set not partitioned
:sysact.Data set entry: retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a partitioned data set for option 3.0 or 3.1.
:msg.Data set/member in use
:sysact.SAVE: retry screen displayed and save
ignored, because the same data set and
member is processed by an RPF of another TSO user
:presp.Wait for availability of the ds/member or
save the data in another member or data set.
:msg.I/O error
:sysact.Data set not edited or saved, BLDL fails with RC=8.
:presp.Repair data set or specify another data set.
:msg.Invalid member name
:sysact.SAVE not executed, retry screen displayed.
:presp.Enter a valid member name.
:msg.Invalid option
:sysact.Function ignored on the retry screen.
:presp.Select one of the functions displayed on the screen.
:msg.Invalid record length
:sysact.Data set or member not processed.
:presp.EDIT a data set or member with a LRECL of at least 40
and no more than 255.
:msg.LIBRARIA not installed
:sysact.module LIBRARIA not found, retry menu displayed.
:presp.Install LIBRARIAN or specify another option.
:msg.LRECL input > output
:sysact.Save not executed, retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify a data set with a LRECL equal or larger than
the input data set to avoid truncation of data.
:msg.Member not found
:sysact.Data set entry and SAVE: retry screen displayed.
:presp.Specify an existing member.
:msg.Member xxxxxxxx exists
:sysact.SAVE: retry screen displayed.
:presp.
:ol.
:li.Enter '2' to reuse the member.
:li.Enter '1' and change the allocations
to save in another data set or member.
:li.Press PF03/PF15 to abort the save.
:eol.
:msg.PFK's RESET
:sysact.Changes of PFKs executed.
:presp.None.
:msg.TEMPRPF restricted
:sysact.Save not executed, retry screen displayed.
:presp.Enter another member name. (TEMPRPF is used
in the internals of RPF).
:msg.Workspace empty
:sysact.Edit current workspace not executed.
:presp.None.
:emsgl.
:h2.Module list and installation requirements.
:h3.Module list.
:p.
See :tref refid=tbl1 for the module list.
:rdef id=rpf1 arrange='1 2 3 4' hp=0  align='l l c l'
      cwidths='15 *' mindepth=1.
:rdef id=rpf1h arrange='1 2 3 4' hp=2 align='l l c l'
      cwidths='15 *' mindepth=2.
:table refid=rpf1 id=tbl1 split=yes.
:tcap.Module list
:thd   refid=rpf1h.
:c 1.Module
:c 2.Function
:c 3.AMODE
:c 4.Attributes
:ethd.
:row   refid=rpf1.
:c 1.RPFMAIN
:c 2.RPF Main processor (alias RPF)
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFALLOC
:c 2.RPF data set functions
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFARCH
:c 2.Archiver maintenance processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFARSVE
:c 2.Save member or data set into Archiver cluster
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFASM00
:c 2.ISPF interface for RPF foreground assembly and link
:c 3.24
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFASM
:c 2.RPF Assembler and Linkage editor processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:C 1.RPFBRO
:c 2.BROWSE processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFCHNG
:c 2.Module to process the 'C' command
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFCNVDT
:c 2.Module to convert a Julian date to a Gregorian date
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFC3270
:c 2.Module to compress the 3270 data stream in EDIT and Browse
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFDAIR
:c 2.RPF Dynamic allocation processor
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFDATAL
:c 2.Allocation menu for EDIT and utility functions
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFDEF
:c 2.Session defaults processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFDOC
:c 2.Add timestamp after //* LAST UPDATE:
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFED
:c 2.RPF Browse/Edit/RESET/PDS TSO command processor with
aliasses RPFBR, RPFPD and RPFST
:c 3.24 or 31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFEDIT
:c 2.The RPF EDIT processor
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFEDITL
:c 2.Load data set in EDIT workspace
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFEND
:c 2.RPF clean up routine
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFFILL
:c 2.Module for the 'FILL', 'UC' and 'LC' primary command
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFFIND
:c 2.Module for the 'F' primary command.
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFHCPY
:c 2.RPF hardcopy processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFHELP
:c 2.RPF HELP processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFINIT
:c 2.Housekeeping of RPF
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFJCL1
:c 2.JCL checking routine part 1
:c 3.31
:c 4.
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFJCL2
:c 2.JCL checking routine part 2
:c 3.31
:c 4.
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFLIB
:c 2.LIBRARIAN maintenance (inc. LIBFAIR)
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFLIB01
:c 2.LIBRARIAN update processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFLIB02
:c 2.Userid/name table for RPFLIB01
:c 3.24
:c 4.
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFLISTC
:c 2.Search the catalog for a certain data set level
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFMVCPY
:c 2.RPF Move/Copy processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFOPER
:c 2.RPF Operator mode
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFOUT
:c 2.The output processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:row.
:c 1.RPFPDS
:c 2.Library processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFPFK
:c 2.PFK definition processor
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFSAVE
:c 2.SAVE workspace processor
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFSRCH
:c 2.Search data set processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFSTAT
:c 2.RPF session status
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFSUB
:c 2.RPF job submitter
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFTEST
:c 2.RPF TEST processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFTSO
:c 2.RPF TSO command processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFUTIL
:c 2.RPF utility menu
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFV
:c 2.TSO command processor to create a DSLIST.
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFVTOC
:c 2.VTOC read processor
:c 3.31
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.RPFVTOC1
:c 2.VTOC data set selection list processor
:c 3.N/A
:c 4.RENT, REUS
:erow.
:etable.
:note.Notes
:ul c.
:li.The modules with AMODE N/A are loaded and called, so the
addressing mode will be inherited from the caller.
:li.All the RPF programs are written in Assembler-XF.
:li.RPF uses 11 user macros and 3 copy members:
:ol c.
:li.CALLTS:   general IKJDAIR execution routine (copy code).
:li.CSR:      convert SBA to row/column,
:li.DSNPARS:  copy member to parse the data set names (copy code).
:li.JCLCOMM:  used in the JCL processor,
:li.RCTOSBA:  calculatie a row/column to SBA,
:li.RPFCOMM:  macro to define the RPF common area,
:li.RPFPROF:  mapping macro of the @RPFPROF member,
:li.RPFSA24:  conditional switch to AMODE 24 and
:li.RPFSA31:  conditional switch to AMODE 31.
:li.RPFSORT:  sort the EDIT workspace on a certain field.
:li.SUBR:     call subroutines in RPFJCL1.
:li.SYCONVHX: the convert hex to EBCDIC macro,
:li.SYSVARS:  contains environment variables. Examine this
member and change the values according your environment.
This is only needed if you assemble the sources.
:li.TPUTS:    copy code for terminal I/O.
:eol.
:li.Special for MVS38J and MVS/380 user's, 2 dummy macros called
AMODE and RMODE are made to get correct assemblies with the
Assembler-XF. If Assembler-H (IEV90) or HL-ASM (ASMA90) are used,
do not use these macros.
:li.For MVS38J and MVS/380 user's, 2 modified macros (GETMAIN and
IHBOPLST) are made. You can copy these macros to SYS1.MACLIB, use
job COPYMAC in the RPF JCL library. See chapter below.
.br
A better way is to include RPF.V200.MACLIB (rpf200s1.zip) as first
library in the SYSLIB concatenation of the assembly of RPF
(MVS38J only).
.br
The modifications on GETMAIN and IHBOPLST are made by Paul Edwards.
:eul.
:h3.Installation and requirements.
:p.
RPF will be distributed as 7 zipped XMI data sets. You will find
these files on www.prince-webdesign.nl/rpf.
:ul c.
:li.File 1. rpf200mv.zip, the MVS38J and MVS380 load modules.
:li.File 2. rpf200os.zip, the OS/390 and z/OS load modules.
:li.File 3. rpf200he.zip, the RPF HELP library.
:li.File 4. rpf200jc.zip, the RPF JCL library.
:li.File 5. rpf200as.zip, the RPF source library.
:li.File 6. rpf200pn.zip, the RPF ISPF panels.
:li.File 7. rpf200s1.zip, the RPF macro library (for MVS38J and
MVS380 only).
:li.File 8. rpf200svas.zip, the RPF source library for OS/VS2 rel. 1
(SVS).
:li.File 9. rpf200vsld.zip, the SVS load modules
:eul.
:p.
Files 1-4 are required to install RPF. Files 5 and 6 are optional.
:p.
After unzip, the files should be uploaded to your system with
IND$FILE. After upload use the utility $RECV370 or the TSO command
RECEIVE INDATASET.
.br
For Hercules or Hyperion user's, the dasdload function is
available.
:p.
A sample of a RECV370 job is below:
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
//LOADRPF  JOB 01,'RPF LOAD',REGION=2048K,MSGCLASS=X,CLASS=A
//RECV370 EXEC PGM=RECV370
//STEPLIB  DD  DISP=SHR,DSN=load-lib-of-RECV370
//XMITPRT  DD  SYSOUT=*
//RECVLOG  DD  SYSOUT=*
//*
//XMITIN   DD  DISP=SHR,DSN=uploaded-XMI-file
//SYSPRINT DD  SYSOUT=*
//SYSIN    DD  DUMMY
//SYSUT1   DD  DSN=&&SYSUT1,
//             UNIT=SYSALLDA,
//             SPACE=(CYL,(8,4),RLSE),
//             DISP=(,DELETE)
//SYSUT2   DD  DSN=RPF-library,
//             UNIT=SYSALLDA,VOL=SER=vvvvvv,
//             SPACE=(CYL,(8,4,25),RLSE),
//             DISP=(,CATLG)
:exmp.
:figcap.Sample RECV370 job.
:efig.
:p.
An alternative way to install RPF is obtaining RPF from
www.cbttape.org. RPF is available in file 415 and will be
distributed as 1 zipped XMIT file, which can be obtained with
a Hyperion/Hercules dasdload function, with the RECV370 utility
of Jim Morrison (file 571 on www.cbttape.org) or with the TSO/E
RECEIVE INDATASET command.
After obtaining file 415, read the member @INSTALL carefully.
:p.
The job below is optional.
:ul c.
:li.Member AMODE31 in the JCL library to set the correct
correct addressing mode. This job is optional. Run this job
against SYS2.CMDLIB.
:eul.
:h3.TSOKEYxx in SYS1.PARMLIB
:p.
RPF needs the following minimum buffers in member TSOKEYxx in
SYS1.PARMLIB:
.br
HIBFREXT=16384
.br
LOBFREXT=8192
:h3.SMS support and Indexed VTOC's
:p.
RPF has the possibility to support indexed VTOC's and some SMS
facilities like PDS/E support and large volumes in OS/390
and z/OS systems.
.br
Use the file rpf200os.zip to install the OS390 or z/OS load modules.
With this support the package RPF/E has become obsolete.
:p.
If using indexed VTOC's in older systems like MVS/XA with DFP
installed, no large volumes are supported.
.br
Update member SYSVARS in the source library and set the variables
&SMS and &LARGE both to 0. Assemble and link RPFVTOC afterwards.
RPFVTOC should be linked with the RENT attribute.
:p.
After RPF has been installed into SYS2.CMDLIB or equivalent with
job $CMDLIB in the JCL library, you can delete the optional
data sets if you wish:
:ol c.
:li.RPF.V200.ASM
:li.RPF.V200.LOAD or RPF.V200.ZOS.LOAD
:li.RPF.V200.JCL
:li.RPF.V200.MACLIB
:eol.
:p.
Start RPF on your TSO terminal and enter option 3.4 (data set list)
and specify 'RPF' (without quotes) in the PREFIX field.
Place a D before the data set name (and confirm the deletion with
PF12 of PF24).
:h3.Other requirements.
:p.
All the RPF modules can be assembled and linked separately.
:p.
The default unitname of existing not-cataloged data sets is SYSALLDA.
The default unitname of newly created and temporary workdata sets is
SYSDA. These defaults can be changed by applying the following ZAP
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
//ZAPUNIT  JOB (acct),pgmr
//ZAP01   EXEC PGM=AMASPZAP,PARM='IGNIDRFULL'
//SYSPRINT DD  SYSOUT=*
//SYSLIB   DD  DSN=rpf.loadlib,DISP=SHR
//SYSIN    DD  *
 NAME RPFMAIN COMMAREA
 VER 0018 E2E8E2C4C1404040               * C'SYSDA   '
 REP 0018 ................               * replacement of SYSDA
 VER 0020 E2E8E2C1D3D3C4C1               * C'SYSALLDA'
 REP 0020 ................               * replacement of SYSALLDA
/*
:exmp.
:figcap.Changing defaults
:efig.
The module RPFLIB needs the file access interface
routines of the LIBRARIAN package.
Upon link edit of RPFLIB the following modules should be
included from the LIBRARIAN loadlibrary:
1. FAIROPN.  2. FAIRMOD.  3. FAIRREC.  4. FAIRCLS.
:p.
:lblbox.Note
The RPF common area can be mapped, by using the 'RPFCOMM'
macro.
:elblbox.
:p.
If you want to use the HAR primary command of RPF, then include
the application 'RPFHCPY' in application major node of your
VTAM definition library.
Example how to define RPFHCPY follows below:
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
RPFHCPY APPL AUTH=(ACQ) /* HAR COMMAND OF RPF */
:exmp.
:figcap.define RPFHCPY
:efig.
In the main menu (option 5) is a user exit available:
The name of the exit should be RPFUSER1.
Each function in RPFUSER1 is allowed; e.g. filling the workspace,
link and call other RPF-routines.
The entry points of the following RPF routines are available
The entry points can be found in the 'RPFCOMM' area.
:ol c.
:li.RPFEDIT (field named EPEDIT)
:li.RPFDATAL (field named EPDATAL)
:li.RPFDAIR (field named EPDAIR)
:li.RPFCHNG (field named EPCHNG)
:li.RPFFILL (field named EPFILL)
:li.RPFFIND (field named EPFIND)
:li.RPFEDITL (field named EPEDITL)
:li.RPFPFK   (field named EPPFK)
:li.RPFSAVE (field named EPSAVE)
:li.RPFSUB  (field named EPSUB)
:li.RPFUTIL (field named EPUTIL)
:li.RPFVTOC1 (field named EPVTOC1)
:li.RPFC3270 (field named EPC3270)
:li.RPFCNVDT (field named EPCNVDT)
:eol.
The other RPF routines can be obtained by the 'LINK' macro
In register 1 in RPFUSER1 is placed an address of a fullword,
which contains the address of the 'RPFCOMM' area, which can be
mapped by using the 'RPFCOMM' macro.
It is recommended to use reg 11 as the address of the 'RPFCOMM'
area and to use reg 13 as the base register.
If you want to give a message in the RPF main menu upon exit of the
RPFUSER1 routine, you can place a 25 byte message in field 'COMMPRM'
of the 'RPFCOMM' area.
If you have no RPFUSER1 exit in your installation, RPF will ignore
the exit accompanied with the message:
'RPFUSER1 not found'
:p.
Example how to write the exit.
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
RPFUSER1 CSECT
         BALR   15,0                Clean Entry Point register
         USING  *,15                Get temporary addressability
         SAVE   (14,12),,*          Save registers
         LA     11,SAVEAREA         Get save area
         ST     11,8(0,13)          Forward pointer chain
         ST     13,SAVEAREA+4       Backward pointer chain
         LR     13,11               Pickup save ares
         B      START               Branch around save area
         DS     0F
SAVEAREA DC     18F'-1'             Declaration of the save area
START    DS     0H
         DROP   15                  Kill temporary addressability
         USING  SAVEAREA,13         Use register 13 as base
         L      11,0(1)             Pickop parameter
         USING  COMMAREA,11         Address 'RPFCOMM' area
         ...                        )
         ...                        )   Your own coding
         ...                        )
         ...                        )
         LINK   EP=RPFPDS,PARAM=((11))  (example how to link)
         ...
         L      15,EPEDIT
         CALL   (15),((11))        Example how to call RPF modules
         ...
COMMAREA RPFCOMM ,                  RPFCOMM dsect
         END
:exmp.
:figcap.Example how to write the exit
:efig.
:p.Example how to define the RPF profile data set. You will
find this job in member $PROFILE in the RPF JCL data set.
Run this job only if you install RPF for the first time.
If IBM's ISPF or Wally's ISPF is installed, skip this job.
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
//PROFILE  JOB 01,RPF,CLASS=A,MSGCLASS=X,REGION=0K,NOTIFY=Z531415
//*********************************************************************
//*
//* DESC: INSTALL RPF PROFILE DATA SET.
//*
//*********************************************************************
//PROFILE EXEC PGM=IEFBR14
//PROFILE  DD  DSN='UserID'.ISP.PROF,UNIT=SYSDA,
//             SPACE=(CYL,(1,,5)),DISP=(NEW,CATLG),
//             DCB=(RECFM=FB,LRECL=80,BKSIZE=multiple of 80)
:exmp.
:figcap.Example how to define the RPF profile data set
:efig.
.br
The name of the profile data set should be specified in the //ISPPROF
DD-statement in the TSO logon procedure or allocated with the
TSO ALLOCATE command (in the startup CLIST).
:p.
RPFLIB01 (the LIBRARIAN update processor)
loads the module RPFLIB02 if present.
RPFLIB02 refers to a table, which contains userid/name
entries. This module should be update according your own company,
you should specify the names of all the inhouse TSO-userids.
A skeleton member called RPFLIB02 is added on the installation tape
each entry in RPFLIB02 consist of a 7 byte userid and a 15 byte
name field.
:p.
:lblbox.Note
use no blanks inside the name field, except trailing blanks.
an example how to use RPFLIB02 follow below:
:elblbox.
:p.
:fig place=inline frame=box concat=no.
:xmp.
RPFLIB02  CSECT                                               *)
*                                                             *)
*         LICENSED MATERIAL (C)-2025 Skybird Systems          *)
*                                                             *)
$LENGTH   EQU  22          LENGTH OF ENTRY                    *)
$ENTRIES  DC   A(($STOP-$START)/$LENGTH)  NUMBER ENTRIES      *)
          DC   CL7'TSOUSER',CL15'CHARLIE.TSO    '
          DC   CL7'IBMUSER',CL15'JOHN.CE        '
$LAST     DC   22X'FF'      SHOULD BE THE LAST ENTRY          *)
$STOP     EQU  *                                              *)
          END                                                 *)
:exmp.
:figcap.RPFLIB02
:efig.
:p.
:lblbox.Note
The statements flagged with a '*)' are in the skeleton deck.
:elblbox.
:h2.RPF default PFKs and workspace size.
:p.
The default PFKs contain the following commands:
:rdef id=rpf2 arrange='1 2 3' hp=0  align='l l c'
      cwidths='15 48 10' mindepth=1.
:rdef id=rpf2h arrange='1 2 3' hp=2 align='l l c'
      cwidths='15 48 10' mindepth=2.
:table refid=rpf2 id=tbl2 split=yes.
:tcap.Default Program Function Keys
:thd   refid=rpf2h.
:c 1.PFK :c 2.Command :c 3.CON
:ethd.
:row refid=rpf2.
:c 1.01  :c 2.HELP :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.02 :c 2.not-defined :c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.03 :c 2.END SAVE :c 3.Y
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.04 :c 2.RETURN :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.05 :c 2.FIND :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.06 :c 2.not defined:c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.07 :c 2.UP  :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.08 :c 2.DOWN:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.09 :c 2.not defined :c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.10 :c 2.LEFT:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.11 :c 2.RIGHT:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.12 :c 2.RETRIEVE :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.13  :c 2.HELP :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.14 :c 2.not-defined :c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.15 :c 2.END SAVE :c 3.Y
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.16 :c 2.RETURN :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.17 :c 2.FIND :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.18 :c 2.not defined :c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.19 :c 2.UP  :c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.20 :c 2.DOWN:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.21 :c 2.not defined :c 3.X
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.22 :c 2.LEFT:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.23 :c 2.RIGHT:c 3.N
:erow.
:row.
:c 1.24 :c 2.RETRIEVE :c 3.N
:erow.
:etable.
:p.
The default workspace size=7,000 lines.
.br
:lblbox.Note
All these defaults can be overruled by the user.
Select '0' on the main menu to change the defaults.
.br
The defaults for the user are written on the RPF
profile data set if available.
:elblbox.
